Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Number of Reviews
30

Author
Christopher Null
     It's been over two years since Canadian auteur Atom Egoyan first came to
my attention with his breakthrough film EXOTICA.  Since then, I've become
something of an aficionado of his works through home video, and it was with
breathless anticipation that I awaited what was sure to be the movie that
pushed him into the mainstream: THE SWEET HEREAFTER.
     Maybe I over-hyped it in my mind, becoming too hopeful in the face of
overwhelming praise for the film.  Or maybe I know Egoyan's tricks too well by
now.  Either way, I left the film extremely pleased but depressed: partly
because the movie is such a downer, and partly because I know Egoyan can do
even better.
     This time around, Atom uses his multiple time-line storytelling to relay
the events surrounding the tragedy when a school bus careens off an icy road
in a sleepy town in the Great White North.  When lawyer Ian Holm swoops in to
build a negligence case against the bus manufacturer and the city, he becomes
the unwitting agent as the revealer of the dirty secrets that everyone within
seems to hide.
     It almost sounds like David Lynch territory, and without his trademark
glorious revelation--a scene the binds all the characters' lives together and
which Egoyan traditionally ends his films with--it almost is.  Instead of
pumping up the mystery, Egoyan has opted for a slower pace of gradually
revealing the secrets behind the facade... something that probably makes the
film more accessible to the masses, but is less pleasing on the whole.  Then
again, Holm is in the role of his life here, and the movie is absolutely worth
seeing if only for his performance.
     Don't get me wrong.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is a *riveting* film, one that I
encourage you to see, as long as you aren't feeling suicidal, as it really is
deeply depressing.  At the same time, I also urge you to check out EXOTICA,
CALENDAR, and THE ADJUSTER on home video.  If nothing else, you'll come out
feeling normal, no matter how nuts you really are.
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producer: Atom Egoyan, Camelia Frieberg
Writer: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Ian Holm, Maury Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, Peter Donaldson, Bruce
Greenwood, David Hemblen, Brooke Johnson, Arsinée Khanjian, Tom McCamus,
Stephanie Morgenstern, Earl Pastko, Sarah Polley
http://www.flf.com/sweet/index.html
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Atom Egoyan's lyrical approach to the troubles afflicting a
remote town in British Columbia has virtually all the attributes
an intelligent moviegoer looks for in a film.  By eschewing the
special effects that stamp a film as either Hollywood-kitsch or
pretentious nonsense, he afford exceptional import to a single
visual image which can devastate his audience.  "The Sweet
Hereafter" employs the superb acting talent of Ian Holm in the
role of a lawyer, whose amoral interference in a community's
severe tragedy underscores the grief of its citizenry.  Perhaps
the film's most striking merit is Egoyan's juxtaposition of
Robert Browning's poem, "The Pied Piper of Hamelin," with
the direction taken by anguish-stricken families in the
aftermath of a disaster.  And Egoyan cleverly likens the
attorney's personal heartache with the suffering of the people
he is to represent in a class-action lawsuit.
  Adapting a novel by Russell Banks which is a fragmented as
the film, Egoyan lends his personal touch to a moral tale,
exploring the ways in which the sudden death of fourteen
children in a school-bus accident changes the isolated village.
To their credit, neither novelist Banks nor filmmaker Egoyan
attempts to simplify matters by contrasting a happy, solid,
truly bonded and joyous population with a numbingly sad and
changed people.  Dark elements existed previous to the
tragedy, though the accident does provide a an opportunity
for its female lead--Sarah Polley in the role of a young woman
who is crippled by the mishap--to cleanse herself and to some
degree the entire surroundings.
   The incident which changes the face of the tiny rural area
of Sam Dent, British Columbia, is the skidding of a school bus
from an icy road and its subsequent sinking into the icy
waters of a frozen lake below, killing fourteen of its youthful
riders and maiming several others--including its guilt-ridden
driver, Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose).  The event itself is
portrayed almost as an anti-climax, occurring well into the
movie, a choice which emphasizes the director's major
intention.  As the film opens Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) is
stuck in a car-wash, frustrated not so much by the almost
farcical situation he is in as by a phone call he has received
from his daughter, Zoe (Caerthan Banks), a desperate young
woman who is a drug addict and repeatedly contacts her
father for money.  We soon gather that the anguished
Stephens has set himself upon the Sam Dent community not
primarily to enrich himself by the one-third cut he would
receive as his fee for prosecuting a successful civil suit.  He
uses the circumstance to elude his own psychic pain at the
"loss" of his daughter, plunging compulsively into his work to
forget his own misery.  His seriousness and apparent sincerity
win over the folks of the town who have suffered the loss of
their children, and most of the aggrieved sign on to the class-
action suit, trusting him in much the way the children of the
village of Hamelin followed the Pied Piper.  The one major
holdout, a widower (Bruce Greenwood)  who was accustomed
to following the school bus each morning in his own car,
threatens the lawyer with physical harm, insisting that the
people do not care about the money but desire simply to be
left alone in their grief.  By contrast, Sam (Tom McCamus),
the youthful father of crippled teenager Nicole (Sarah Polley),
arouses the suspicions of his daughter by being greedily
drawn to the lawyer's promise of big bucks beyond what the
school's insurance has already paid to the injured families.
   Egoyan highlights sordid relationships which, in the hands
of a hack, could have been the grist for the soap-opera mills. 
Billy Ansell (Greenwood) is carrying on an affair with the
unhappy Risa Walker (Alberta Watson), and even worse,
Sam, who relates to his daughter as would flower children to
one another during the Woodstock era, is regularly committing
incest with his not unwilling teenager.  
   Despite the unhappiness of so many in the community even
before the accident, "The Sweet Hereafter" shows graphically
and yet in an understated, lyric tone, the ways in which the
disaster has permanently changed the face of the backwater
burg.  Egoyan has filmed his work in a style whose
fragmentation adds much to its inflections, switching with
uncanny expertise from 1995 to 1997 and back, while
periodically crowding several incidents into a single scene as
when he focuses on a family argument involving Wendell
(Maury Chaykin) and his unhappy wife Risa while allowing us
to eavesdrop on a telephone conversation between the lawyer
and his woebegone daughter.
   Ian Holm centers the entire piece in his extraordinary
performance as a pained and prosperous professional who
has difficulty coming to grips with the loss of his own
daughter, Zoe, to drugs and who is ultimately to accept defeat
at the hands of a girl who is younger and wiser than the
narcissistic Zoe.  "The Sweet Hereafter" is bleak, but offers a
tragic air that pays heed to the ultimate dignity of an
aggrieved people.  Not Rated.  Running Time: 110 minutes. 
(C) 1997 Harvey Karten

Author
James Brundage
Starring Ian Holm, Bruce Greenwood, Arsinee Khanjian, Tom McCamus, Sarah
Polley, Caerthan Banks, Stephanie Morgenstern, Gabrielle Rose
     There is a film I keep coming back to.  It is a comfort to my pain --
the shoulder of a good friend to cry on.  It has helped me through extreme
hardship -- been there for me with a reassuring message.  When I want to
blame, this film tells me to think again.  This film, friends, is Atom
Egoyan's The Sweet Hereafter.
     The film is a tour de force of mythical storytelling.  An adaptation of
Russell Banks novel, it follows the events before, during, and after an
accident in Sam Dent, New York.  This accident is one that is as tragic as
it is real: a school bus hits a patch of ice and goes off the road, killing
fourteen of the twenty two passengers and leaving one of them paralyzed from
the waist down.
     We are all familiar with these types of accidents.  In the massive
world in which we live, they are everyday occurrences. Quickly forgotten,
out of sight and out of mind, we never truly hear of the aftermath.  After
the accident, the lawyer Mitchell Stevens (Ian Holm) descends upon the town
in order to begin class-action litigation.
    An ambulance chaser by profession, his job is to assign blame to a
blameless item and attempt to give monetary compensation to an emotional
loss.  However, Mitchell Stevens is not telling these people the mantras
that someone is to blame in order to comfort them, nor in order to rile them
up for a lawsuit.  "There is no such thing as an accident" he tells people,
and himself.
    He sees himself as an avenger of wrongs, truly believing every word he
says because he repeats them to himself so often.  Ironically, his daughter,
a drug addict with AIDS, is an accident where no one is to blame.  In the
effort to console himself to counterbalance the out-of-control life of his
own, he has created a world where he is in control, where he is doing the
right thing and affixing blame.  He claims his job is to ensure moral
integrity.
Far from being the main character, Mitchell Stevens is only a part of the
myriad of stories surrounding the accident.  The Burnell family is home to
Nicole (Sarah Polley), a woman crippled in the accident and Sam (Tom
McCamus), a father coping with a power shift as his own lies and abuse turn
around and bite him.  Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose) is a bus driver
having to cope with self-guilt over believing she has caused a blameless
accident.  Billy Ansel (Bruce Greenwood) is a Vietnam vet who has now lost
everything: his two twins died in the accident and his wife died from cancer
a couple of years before.
    The story shows the severe pain of the accident, and then the incredible
need to affix blame.  Whether it be people who turn away from religion due
to their own inability to accept a God who would let this happen or the need
to believe that an act such as Nicole wearing one of Billy Ansel's late
wife's shirts brought bad luck, or the belief that the guardrail was too
weak or that someone calculated the cost variance between a ten cent bolt
and a million dollar out of court settlement, someone or something has to be
to blame.
    We are human, and as human beings blame MUST be affixed to everything.
It is impossible to accept the explanation that it simply happened.  The
film illustrates, however, not that there actually is someone to blame but
rather that the human need to affix blame is a destructive attitude.  The
town eviscerates itself as people begin to take sides, as greed begins to
take over grief and the blame becomes a deadly cancer.
    The film is hauntingly beautiful, populated with incredible images.
Like Fargo and A Simple Plan, it uses a snowy landscape to portray an
emotional bleakness.  It is also populated with extreme symbolism and grave
metaphors worthy of the greatest literary minds.  With a non-linear
narrative and  a great gift for storytelling, writer-director Atom Egoyan
manages to keep his film open to interpretation.  He also juggles in the air
multiple-character storylines and multi-layered narrative.  Augmenting the
book's simple before-and-after layering, he incorporated the Robert Browning
poem "The Pied Piper of Hamelin" as a way to make a literary parallel.
    For those who follow the newsgroup on which I publish all of my reviews,
rec.arts.movies.reviews, you may remember that in fact I have already
reviewed this movie.  I did not do this film justice, and recent events made
me think of it again.
    Currently, we live in a world that has recently been devastated by a
school shooting in Littleton, Colorado.  We are now in stage two of the
disaster: media and lawyer frenzy.  As I type, lawyers and journalists
descend upon Littleton like a plague of locusts.  Copycats have begun to
spring up everywhere (near my home, one school has had a bomb scare and
another had two people walk in wearing black trenchcoats).  Recently, a
Marilyn Manson concert in Colorado was cancelled due to the fact that the
two killers listened to industrial music.
    Fingers are being pointed.  The media is trying to fix blame to anything
they can.  Violent movies, the German band Rammstein, the media: there is
talk of lawsuits everywhere.  The computer game "Doom" is being blamed
because of its violent content.  The parents, as always, are getting more
than their share of flak.  Some people say that the killers were completely
insane.  Religious fanatics say that it is the devil's work.  Atheists will
place blame on anything in the world that they can.  Plenty of us will say
"fate."  The ACLU will argue that it was anything other than anything that
would infringe upon the bill of rights.  The NRA of course claims that it is
blameless, and the police shrug their shoulders.  As soon as the lawyers
begin their destructive reconstruction, these groups will begin to point
fingers at each other.
    On Honnsburger, a KDKA radio show run by a conservative Republican, a
girl called in to say that the other students were to blame for them
insulting the killers to no end.  Honnsburger brought the girl to tears by
telling her she needed therapy and by yelling at her for defending the
killers.  Liberal politicians are calling for more gun control. Conservative
politicians yell back "Guns don't kill people, people kill people."  The
Right Wing is exploiting this to hype the need for censorship of music,
movies, and video games.  The Left Wing is saying, "You can't legislate
responsibility."  School boards call for metal detectors, armed guards, and
higher security.  Janet Reno calls for more guidance counsellors so that we
can prevent such a tragedy from happenning again.  Everyone is saying that
this is a prime example of how our society is out of control.
  Classrooms are divided by diverging opinions.  Water cooler jokes have
turned into water cooler political discussions.  At the rate we're going,
Littleton will become a hot topic in the 2000 presidential debates.
    This insane need to affix blame is ripping the country apart.  Our anger
is taking over our grief, placing us at each other's throats instead of at
funeral parlors.  This is no longer a time of mourning, it is a time of
yelling.  The country is becoming crazier than the act that started the
insanity.
    For all of you, everyone reading this article, I am making the only
demand that I have ever made as a critic.  Go home and rent The Sweet
Hereafter.  View it with Littleton in mind.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     THE SWEET HEREAFTER could serve as a textbook example of the
difference between television movies and "real" movies.  Consider for a
moment what a television producer would do with a book that features a
fatal school bus accident and a lawyer out to sign up the bereaved --
lots of hot sensationalism interrupted with breaks to sell beer and
toothpaste.
     Top-flight writer and director Atom Egoyan delivers instead a film
with tremendous power whose most notable trait is its touching
subtlety.  Based on a respected book of the same name by author Russell
Banks, the movie represents a rethinking of the story's structure, not
merely a literal adaptation of the novel.  Told in linear form by four
narrators in the book, Egoyan's version happens instead in overlapping
time sequences and without a narrator.  The author is even on record as
applauding Egoyan's changes.
     In the press notes the book's author describes the story as "a
parable of lost children."  He says it asks what a town does in the
absence of its children.  Picking up on this, Egoyan has a flashback in
which a sitter, Nicole Burnell, played with grace by Sarah Polley,
reads parts of "The Pied Piper" from an old, illustrated book to her
two charges.   Periodically throughout the picture, Nicole's readings
are heard in voice-over.  You have never heard this moving poem read so
sweetly or in such an appropriate moment.  They and the rest of the
town's children come into harm's way -- some live and others are
seriously injured.  And the entire small Canadian town where the
accident occurs is never the same again.  Although the physical damage
is inflicted mainly on the children, the adults bear the emotional
scars of the loss.
     Ian Holm, in arguably the best performance of his distinguished
career, plays Mitchell Stephens, an intense man of quiet misery.
Mitchell is the outsider in the story set in a small, snow-encrusted
community in the British Columbian wilderness.  His mission there is a
singular one, to sign up the parents so that he can sue someone,
anyone, on their behalf.  If this seems crass, well it is, but Mitchell
approaches his job with the dedication of a religious zealot.
     The story unfolds slowly and always believably.  Each little
aspect has its own fascination.  As Mitchell interviews Wendell and
Rita Walker, played with quiet realism by Maury Chaykin and Alberta
Watson, he has a simple task.  He wants them to suggest some model
couple in the village who has a lost a child so that he can use that
couple to form the basis of the suit.  Wendell ticks off one town
member after another and then, as one can in a small town, enumerates
each person's numerous faults.
     Although the town is no Peyton Place, people there do have their
foibles.  One of the best parents in the town appears to be Billy
Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), who rides his pickup behind the school bus
everyday just so he can wave good-bye to his kids.  Well, single parent
Billy's fault is that he has regularly scheduled trysts with the
married Rita.  His confessions to Rita about his feelings of loss are
one of the many heartfelt outpourings in the story.
     The accident itself, a simple one of a bus hitting a patch of ice,
isn't shown until the middle of the picture, but, nevertheless, the
mystery about it builds throughout the film.  Although the picture is
no detective story, finding out exactly what happened is a subtheme in
a movie that is primarily a character study of a town gripped by
tragedy.
     As the injured bus driver, Gabrielle Rose, Dolores Driscoll plays
the role of a dedicated individual who loves kids with a passion and
for whom the tragedy takes on special meaning.
     To round out the story, Mitchell has his own private tragedy to
bear.  His daughter Zoe (Caerthan Banks) is a drug addict who has
bounced in and out of one half-way house and recovery center after
another.  Fond of calling her dad on his cell phone so she can ask for
money or help, she interrupts him at many emotionally charged moments
as he attempts to sign up the townsfolk.  ("I can help you," Mitchell
tries to reassure Billy.  "Not unless you can raise the dead," Billy
snaps back.  Mitchell's pitch is never an easy one and worrying about
Zoe only makes it harder.)
     Mychael Danna's haunting music sets the stage for tragedy.  The
cinematography by Paul Sarossy is sweeping in its outdoor grandeur, but
it is in the warm, shadowy, intimate moments indoors where it works
best.
     The show, which is ripe for emotional manipulation, never plays
with its audience.  Still, when the house lights go up, you may feel as
I did.  I could barely breathe; I was so overcome by the sum total of
what I had witnessed.
     More than anything, the film is like a master painting.  Each
cinematic brush stroke is carefully laid down by Egoyan with the beauty
building with each dollop of paint.  With the final color in place, the
masterpiece is complete, and the ending credits roll.
     THE SWEET HEREAFTER runs 1:50.  It is rated R for mature themes,
sexuality and some profanity and would be fine teenagers.

Author
Bryant Frazer
       Like his countryman David Cronenberg, Egoyan is one of the
       few great directors working today whose films reflect not
       only a consistent worldview, but also a numinous mood. (Also
       like Cronenberg, Egoyan has set one of this year's most
       memorable scenes inside of an automatic car wash.) Appealing
       no more strenuously to the intellect than to our innate sense
       for beauty, Egoyan's films look chilly but eventually
       surrender warmth. They alienate, distress and confound us.
       What's most miraculous is that they close up the wounds
       they've made.
       If some folks are won over by his rather transparent
       puppetry, it doesn't mean that Stephens is inherently evil.
       Clearly, he's a man doing his job, even if his speech seems
       far too rehearsed for there to be any sincerity left in his
       motives. And, in a positively Egoyanian turn of events, we've
       learned that Stephens is mourning over his own lost child, a
       drug-addled girl named Zoe who has grown into
       post-adolescence as one of the living dead. The film opens,
       in fact, with an idyllic image of Stephens and his wife
       sleeping with their three-year-old daughter between them,
       bathed in warm light. When we see this image for the second
       time, it is as the introduction to the second of two
       incidents that anchor the film. The first is the actual
       on-screen representation of the school bus accident. And the
       second is Stephens' mindscreen recollection of a terrifying
       morning when he found little Zoe swollen from spider bites.
       But never mind. Although THE SWEET HEREAFTER is an even more
       complex puzzle than Egoyan's previous EXOTICA, all these
       disparate elements reveal themselves in similarly good time
       to be an essential part of this multidimensional story.
       Egoyan jumps backward and forward in the narrative with a
       clever deliberacy that reveals bits and pieces of literal and
       metaphorical relationships all in their own time. It verges
       on soap opera: we learn that Wendell's wife Risa is having an
       affair with Billy the widower, whose babysitter is an
       aspiring rock star who's been lured into an unwholesome
       relationship with ... well, again, never mind. You just have
       to see it.
       And oh, is it something to see. Paul Sarossy's camerawork and
       Mychael Danna's music both belong on another plane entirely
       from this world of ours. Danna's exotic score, lending a
       tranquil quietude to the anxious proceedings, layers aural
       texture atop Sarossy's splendid Panavision cinematography
       (which will be wrecked, by the way, on videotape, so see this
       in a theater if you possibly can). The performers often
       inhabit only the very edge of this widescreen frame, their
       individualized reactions highlighted by the often shadowed
       spaces that surround them. The landscape, meanwhile, is
       repeatedly expressed as a richly detailed expanse of snowy
       ground spread beneath low clouds. Even with Sarossy on board,
       never before has an Egoyan film enjoyed a visual sensibility
       quite this keen.
       The pretty pictures provide a sweeping panorama for what is,
       barring perhaps the very different L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, the
       year's most assured ensemble of performers. Leading the way
       is Holm, whose fine performance elicits, by turns, distaste,
       anxiety, and sympathy. His narration of the incident
       involving his daughter and a pocketknife held at the ready
       generates more tension than a year's worth of Hollywood
       "thrillers." Also worthy of special note is the solid Bruce
       Greenwood, whom you may or may not recognize from EXOTICA,
       flexing his thespian muscle as gas station owner Billy Ansel,
       probably the most upstanding of all these characters and
       arguably the film's eventual moral center. And Sarah Polley,
       who had a small role as Greenwood's "babysitter" in the
       previous film, reprises that role here, and then some. (Her
       deposition in Mitchell's case, it turns out, will be key.)
       Longtime Egoyan collaborator Gabrielle Rose strikes an
       authentically daffy note as bus driver Dolores Driscoll, and
       Egoyan's wife Arsinee Khanjian (who had a memorable cameo in
       IRMA VEP) does her part as one-half of a couple whose
       "hippie" sensibilities are tested by the promise of making
       somebody pay for the loss of their adopted child.
       In the end, THE SWEET HEREAFTER rejects that particular idea
       of revenge, positing instead the notion that, shunning
       litigation, a community can care for its own (and suggesting
       that a lie, if told correctly and to the right people, can be
       a much-needed suture on a gaping wound). If that seems an odd
       tack for the impetuously modern Egoyan to take, consider that
       his films have often played out as cautionary tales dwelling
       on the effects of alienation and separation -- the
       substitution of voyeurism for sexuality, and of strained
       relations for companionship. Into this cycle, THE SWEET
       HEREAFTER fits neatly. For all the vigorous gyrations these
       characters go through in coming to terms with their loss,
       only the stubborn Stephens seems to remain an island, having
       run himself dry by the story's end.
       --------------------------------------------------------------
       Written and Directed by Atom Egoyan
       Based on the novel by Russell Banks
       Cinematography by Paul Sarossy
       Edited by Susan Shipton
       Starring Ian Holm, Bruce Greewood, and Sarah Polley
       Canada, 1997
       --------------------------------------------------------------

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Atom Egoyan
Writer: Atom Egoyan (based on the novel by Russel Banks)
Starring: Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Alberta Watson, Tom
McCamus, Gabrielle Rose, Maury Chaykin, David Hemblen, Arsinée Khanjian,
Earl Patsko, Caerthan Banks, Brooke Johnson, Stephanie Morgernstern
"The Sweet Hereafter" is the haunting, sad new film from Atom Egoyan, a
Canadian filmmaker who makes films which revolve around characters and
raise themes and ideas about them.  His new film revolves around the
effects of a horrible tragedy on the small town, as well as about the
effects of death and tragedy on humanity.  When something like this
happens, people are always trying to point a finger at someone to make
them feel better about their grief.  In this film, everyone's searching
for an answer to the major accident that has taken place.
Presented in non-linear form, with several plots running
simultatneously, the film explores what happened when a school bus
filled with kids hit an ice patch on a slick road one morning, and ended
up crashing into an icy lake, killing most of the kids, and leaving a
few crippled survivors, and destroying the community.  In to "help" is
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), a lawyer who is out to sue anyone who had
anything to do with the accident, like the guys who made the bus or the
people who built the railing along the road that the bus crashed
through.
But Mitchell has problems all his own.  His daugher, Zoe (Caerthan
Banks), is a drug addict who has been in and out of several rehabs
without any luck.  He is divorced from his wife, and is continually
getting collect calls from Zoe, whom he fears will end up being the
police to say that they've found her body somewhere.  At the same time
that he's worrying about her continually, he has to be a cold-hearted
bastard in picking on the poor people of the town who are mostly up for
blaming whoever Mitchell says is responsible, but Mitchell is just like
them anyway.
The story "The Pied Piper of Hamlin" by Robert Browning is read
throughout the film to symbolize the entire accident, but the film
doesn't accentuate the kids who are led into the mountain by the angry
piper, but the lame boy who wasn't allowed to go with the other kids. 
The one kid we see who survived, the older Nicole Burnell (Sarah Polley,
looking like a young Uma Thurman) with a bit of an Electra complex, has
been confined to a whellchair, brooding over her previous life, and
seeming to pine over the death of her peers.
But she's not the only lame kid in the film; it seems that the entire
community who had to live through it are the lame kid.  Everyone in the
film is dealing with the accident in their own way, either if its
blaming someone, just wanting to find an answer, or merely brooding over
it.  The bus driver (Gabrielle Rose) has to live with the fact that she
accidentally killed a bunch of kids, but is trying to get over it.  Two
very liberal parents, Wanda and Hartley Otto (Arsinée Khanjian and Earl
Patsko, respectively), have lost their adopted Indian son, and want
whomever had anything to do with it to go to jail until they die.
Meanwhile, Risa, who has been having an affair with a widower, Billy
Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), has succumb to the persuasions of Mitchell,
whom Billy has built up a distaste for after some run-ins with him, and
threat of a subpoena being sent his way at the trial since he was
driving his truck behind the bus when it crushed.  Billy, who was waving
to his kids who were sitting in the back of the bus before it crashed
and killed them, is unable to really cope with the loss of not only his
wife (who died before the events in the film) but of his kids, and has
alienated himself from everyone else, but is not up to simply blaming
someone for the accident.
The flashbacks to the accident, as well as events in Mitchell's private
life intercut the story which shows us the aftermath of the accident,
and result.  But none of these are distracting.  In fact, the background
of Mitchell's life (like a story about how Zoe almost died of a black
widow bite when she was a baby) helps round out his character so he's
not some villanous John Grisham lawyer.  Egoyan never gives us a
narrator, and thus makes "The Sweet Hereafter" into a bit of a puzzle,
with parts the viewer has to piece together.  The opening montage
doesn't make much sense until one sees the rest of the film, thus making
the opening images more poignant.
The acting from everyone is brilliant, as all of them are deep in misery
thorughout the present day part of the film.  Alberta Watson and Bruce
Greenwood are amazing as the cheating pair, who grow apart because of
the accident (Greenwood is especially brilliant).  Egoyan regulars
Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, David Hemblem, and his wife Arsinée Khanjian
are on hand in several smaller roles, and all shine as usual.  And Sarah
Polley is absolutely amazing as the quietly depressed survivor Nicole,
who we're never really sure what she's thinking (especially in one of
the final shocking scenes).
But acting-wise, the movie belongs to veteran British actor, Ian Holm,
who's been in movies since the 60s, but never really become any kind of
legend.  He's more of a cult star, having appeared in numerous films,
from Ash the android in "Alien" to the weasel-looking Polonious in the
Mel Gibson version of "Hamlet" and most recently as the priest in "The
Fifth Element," Holm has not always been one of the most popular, but
definitely one of the best.  But this is perhaps his most brilliant
performance.  We see a shewd jerk on the surface of his character, a man
with a stone face who can say to his daughter without stuttering "I
don't know who I'm talking to anymore."  But underneath is a man who is
quitely sad, harbored by such intense misery and even more depressed
than any of the people in the town.  When he finally does break down and
cry, I wanted to cry along with him.  Holm's is probably the best
performance of the year.
But this film is really Egoyan's, who paints every single scene with the
right kind of atmosphere, and sense of misery that it needs.  From the
first couple scenes to the finale, he holds us in his hypnotic grasp,
and hits every single right emotional cord.  I think I counted about six
times when I was just about to cry (I never cry at movies, at least in
the theaters).  And his writing is brilliant, layering out the film
perfectly and flawlessly interjecting flashbacks in to the plot without
harming the underlying storyline.  The film unfolds beautifully, much
like Egoyan's other films do, but in a more emotional and interesting
fashion.
Take for example the bus crash scene, which in any other movie would
take place in the beginning.  He positions it in the middle of the film,
building it up so much that when it finally occurs, it's not
anti-climactic, but emotionally draining.  And it's not even nihilistic:
we don't see the bus go off the cliff, but we see it in the face of
Bruce Greenwood, who witnesses the entire thing.  The sight of the bus
sliding along the thin ice, then crashing is still one of the scariest
things I've seen this year or any other year.
"The Sweet Hereafter" is perhaps the most poignant and saddening film
I've seen all year.  Afterwards, I felt emotionally moved, and could
hardly get out of my seat.  The reason for this is it's smartly done,
not controlling the audience, but allowing us to reach our own
conclusion.  It has a long-lasting effect on people because it doesn't
answer everything this movie brings up.  There are many things I've been
thinking about after seeing this film, and have not come up with the
answers yet.  The people in this film are all searching for answers, but
the sad truth it there is none.  It was an accident, and looking for any
kind of answer to all the questions will lead to only more suffering and
depression.  There is no answer to many of the questions posed by this
film, and becuase the film knows that, it lingers on farther than any
film released this year.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
James Brundage
And the peace came to me In The Sweet Hereafter
Indeed the hereafter is sweet. I watched the film on vacation, at a friends,
having been cramped in a town where I was isolated from the foreign film,
the independent film. Sundance award winners, Cannes award winners: all of
them, excluded from my quaint little hamlet. However, I made it a resolution
to rent a "real" movie while away, and I did.
The Sweet Hereafter tells a simple tale of a simple people (it felt so much
like home) who's lives are destroyed by an accident that kills several
children when a bus goes off the road and through the ice. This alone,
however, did not win it the Grand Prix. What got it that was the subtle,
beautiful way that the stories are all intertwined: the lawyer with his own
daemons who tries to channel their anger towards an adversary that does not
exist. The small towners who MUST blame, for it is so human to do so, and
who talk about others behind their backs. The survivor confined to a
wheelchair. The daughter of the lawyer, a compulsive liar who may or may not
have AIDS and has been in drug clinics all her life.
The Sweet Hereafter takes its morals out of a children' book, in which a
piper lead all of the children of the town into a magical cave save one: a
cripple (symbolic, of course, of the wheelchair girl), who is the only one
who can see the truth after all that has transpired. It is a homage to the
happenstance, to the terrible tragedies that befall us and leave us
wondering "why?" The irony being that the one who was most affected by the
accident is the one who wants revenge the least, and who realizes the truth:
that there is no one to blame, but that we must have someone to lay our
guilty conscience upon.

Author
Omar Odeh

Commentary about The Sweet Hereafter has had as much to do with Atom
Egoyan as it has had to do with the film itself. Egoyan's career
trajectory has followed a trajectory, that is made explicit by his
latest film, from; small budgets to larger ones, family centered cast
to professional, specific- personal themes to universal-personal
etc...  This makes questions of changes in quality or level of his
work particularly important. The general consensus seems to be that
while the merits of the film are clear, the position to whcih Egoyan
seems to be going is questionable. I disagree.
Interestingly, the style here seems reminiscent of Egoyan's earlier
films. Next of Kin in particular comes to mind. The simpler
associative techniques, for instance, like the repeated tilts and pans
linking key characters and events in each film. At the same time there
are set pieces that convincingly demonstrate a new level of technical
mastery; the muted crash scene is the best example. This has come
about, in all likelihood, because of the fact that the scale of The
Sweet Hereafter dwarfs anything Egoyan has done to date. On this
basis, the film marks a new phase for the director. If one accepts
that this is the analog to Next of Kin, with respect to this second
phase, imagine the analog to The Adjuster...
After Exotica, the ante was raised and Egoyan has answered by making a
film on a fairly large scale, addressing complex themes, in a
responsible and challenging manner. Thematically, the film exposes the
inadequacies of one of soceity's most treasured symbolic languages:
the law. Specifically, in the face of issues such as community and
redistribution. Egoyan's critique is savage and embedded in an
intricate flashback structure that remains extremely clear throughout
the film. It would have been very easy for the strategy to end up
muddled, especially since the source material (Russell Banks' novel of
the same title) is said to be more linear.
Impatiently awaiting installment 2-1.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Canadian director Atom Egoyan is one of the few true visionaries in the film
world today. He consistently deals in themes of forbidden desires, melancholy
loss, murder, and mourning.  "The Adjuster" and the excellent "Exotica" are
rare examples of films that break through the facade of cheap sentimentality
and aim to reveal our innermost secrets and desires. Egoyan's new film "The
Sweet Hereafter," an adaptation of a Russell Banks novel, is a hauntingly
expressive work about a school bus accident that leaves a small town in
despair. 
The brilliant Ian Holm stars as Mitchell Stevens, a forlorn attorney
journeying to a small town in the snowy hills of British Columbia to represent
the parents of children killed in a school bus accident. He wants to represent
their grief, and looks to recompense by filing a class-action suit against the
bus company. "There is no such thing as an accident," declares Mitchell. At
first glance, he might seem like a cold-hearted lawyer in it for the money, but
we start to see a man - tortured by his own suppressed grief - coming to terms
with the tragedy and its aftermath. Mitchell's grief is his loveless junkie
daughter who frequently calls him for money on his cell phone.
 Naturally, the townspeople's grief is of greater consequence. There's the
hippie couple whose adopted son died in the accident; another parent (Bruce
Greenwood) who followed the bus carrying his two children and is the only
witness; the guilt-ridden bus driver (Gabrielle Rose); and, most memorably, a
teenager (Sarah Polley) who survived the accident and is confined to a
wheelchair, and has strong love ties to her father (droopy-eyed Tom McCamus).
The Greenwood character tries to convince Mitchell and the devastated parents
to drop the lawsuit, but the some of the parents need the money if they win the
case. 
All the characters in "The Sweet Hereafter" are flawed and despondent because
of familial relations except for the surviving teenager. In many ways, she is
the most mature character in the film because she sees past the facade of the
lawsuit and doesn't want to be manipulated by anyone, not even her affectionate
father. 
Mitchell sees himself as a grieving parent because he lost his own child. When
Mitchell is on the plane, he sees a former friend of his daughter's and he
confides in her about his daughter's past accidents with clinics and hospitals.
Mitchell is naturally empathetic when interviewing the grieving, guilty parents
about certain details of the accident - he's a guilty parent, too, trying to
erase the memory of his own daughter. 
"The Sweet Hereafter" is an understated, chilling film of great searing power,
and the actors certainly lend it credence. Ian Holm, one of the finest actors
in the world, manages to make Mitchell Stevens a sympathetic character  who's
eagerly trying to erase his suppressed feelings towards his daughter - the
lawsuit makes him start to care deeply about her. It is superb, finely tuned
acting that should have gained him an Oscar nomination. Sarah Polley
("Exotica") is as mysterious and alluring a young actress as any other - she
makes her teen character both ambiguous and benevolent (she reads "The Pied
Piper" to children) allowing us to see a gradual connection between the
relationship with her father and the school bus tragedy. These are characters
whom you will not likely forget.
Director Atom Egoyan and cinematographer Paul Sarossy successfully make the
wintry Canadian landscape as threatening and haunting as possible. The
depiction of the townspeople's dwellings is just as disturbing - we see drab,
candlelit houses; gloomy motel rooms; and pictures of children and families on
walls that take own a life of their own. The actual school bus accident is
ominously presented in one long take as it skids off the road and falls into a
frozen lake - this whole sequence, shown towards the middle of the film, is as
tragic and emotional as anything in "Titanic." 
The writing by Egoyan cleverly and astutely takes us back and forth during the
aftermath of the accident pinpointing minute details about the uneventful day,
and revealing the identities of the townspeople and their fears, desires and
secrets. 
Perhaps "The Sweet Hereafter" is not as enveloping or as rhythmic as
"Exotica," but it is a superbly realized, unsentimental, poetic and important
film of how a tragedy can change a small town. By the end of the film, with its
sense of emotional chaos, you might think, strangely enough, that the
townspeople are responsible for this tragedy. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or
jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Andy Wright
Directed by Atom Egoyan (Exotica, The Adjuster, Family Viewing)
Written for the screen by Egoyan, from the novel by Russell Banks
Starring: Ian Holm (Alien), Bruce Greenwood (Nowhere Man), Alberta =
Watson (Spanking the Monkey), Sarah Polley (Exotica)
Year of Release: 1997
Rating: R
Deserves Recognition for: Best Picture, Director, Actor (Holm), 
Supporting Actor (Greenwood), Supporting Actress (Polley), Screenplay, 
Production Design (Philip Barker), Music (Michael Danna) - geez, can 
you tell that I liked this one?
Capsule Review:
    To audiences used to movies that tell you how to feel, director Atom 
Egoyan's new film may seem like a cold, lifeless ordeal. The more 
discerning and patient viewer, however, will find this to be a mournful, 
absolutely shattering cinematic experience, possibly the best of the 
last year. Ian Holm gives a magnificent performance as an ambulance 
chasing attorney whose self-serving attempts to heal a small Canadian 
community's pain after a horrific accident only ends up ripping new 
wounds. Egoyan, previously best known for the dark puzzle EXOTICA, 
displays an astonishing mastery of the medium here, freely mixing 
timelines in order to view the tragedy from all sides. (He makes an 
especially resonant and inspired connection with the fable of The Pied 
Piper of Hamlin.) The result is a film that affects the watcher in a 
delayed, haunting fashion; you don't realize you've been hurt until 
you glance down and see the blood.
Copyright 1998 by The Critic formerly known as Andrew Wright
For more insanely biased reviews, check out http://www.seanet.com/~louk/
e-mail louk@seanet.com

Author
Brian Koller
Atom Egoyan directed, co-produced, and wrote the
screenplay for "The Sweet Hereafter", a critically
acclaimed film about a tragic school bus accident
and its effect on a small town.  While parts of the
film are good, it never fully takes off, and the
lead character (a grim lawyer with family problems)
is disappointing.
The story is told through a series of chronologically
jumbled pieces, sometimes leaving the viewer confused
as to whether the scene took place before or after
the accident.  Friendly, dependable Mrs. Driscoll
(Gabrielle Rose) has been driving the school bus for
the past twenty years.  This time, however, the bus
hits an ice patch, and careens off the road onto a
frozen lake.  The ice cracks, the bus sinks, and some
children die, while some survive with injuries, as
does Mrs. Driscoll.
While the parents are still shocked and grieving,
middle-aged lawyer Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) arrives
on the scene, seeking to file a class action lawsuit
against someone or something, and enlisting the parents,
children and bus driver to his cause.  To complicate
the plot, Stephens has a runaway, drug-addicted daughter
(Caerthan Banks), and we learn that several of the
parents are involved in illicit affairs, which apparently
includes incest.
Those who love disaster films will be disappointed in
the accident scene: we see the bus go off the road, but
we don't see what is happening inside.  The chaos, drama
and horror of the actual accident is bypassed.
The gloomy atmosphere is shared by the entire cast.
Driscoll and her stroke victim husband (David Hemblen)
are well-defined characters, as is paralyzed teenager
Nicole (Sarah Polley).  However, Stephens, an unhappy,
reflective man, seems to come alive only when somebody
(including himself) is angry.
The reservations I had with the film were not shared
by the Academy, which gave "The Sweet Hereafter"
Oscar nominations for Best Director and Best Adapted
Screenplay.  The film also won the Cannes "Special
Grand Prize of the Jury".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Dennis Schwartz
SWEET HEREAFTER, THE (director: Atom Egoyan; cast: Ian Holm, Sarah
Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, Gabrielle Rose, Alberta Watson,
Arsinee Khanjian, Earl Pastko, Maury Chaykin, Caerthan Banks, 1997-Can.)
A flawlessly made film, magnificently acted, with  beautiful
cinematography to go with a compelling story, about a school bus
accident resulting in the death and injury to all the 14 children on
board the bus, that tears the heart out of an isolated small-town in
British Columbia, a story that is very difficult to cover in all the
implications it has for the families and ambulance chasing, big-city
lawyer Mitchell Stephens (Ian) involved, yet it does do just that, as
adapted from a Russell Banks novel and brought to screen not only intact
but with a certain forcefulness that reflects the director's ability to
dig deeply into the story and make it both accessible and innovatively
chilling.
>From the opening scene, where Ian receives a call on his cell phone
while in a car wash, from his daughter Zoe (Caerthan), who is a druggie,
in and out of drug clinics for the past 10 years, and a disappointment
to Ian and his separated wife; she hates them both equally as she once
loved them both equally as a child. She will call him at all hours, and
their conversations are regrettably filled with rancor, though they
never stop the relationship completely, even though there is no hope for
it. Something went terribly wrong and either party doesn't know what
else to do. One of the most touching and memorable scenes of the film,
is the distraught Ian telling a school chum of Zoe, while on board a
plane to meet Zoe, how she was bitten by a baby spider when she was 3,
and how he rushed her to a hospital 40 miles away, prepared to do
anything to save her, even operate on her in the car with a pen knife,
if necessary.
The film does not move along in a linear timeline, so it is constantly
going back and forth, from events leading up to the accident, to the
perplexed guilt and anger that permeates Ian's thoughts about his failed
relationship with Zoe. So when Ian arrives at his first potential
client's place, which is a motel owned by Alberta and Maury, we already
know much about the accident and why Ian is there, and we quickly learn
from the couple all the foibles and gossip about the other potential
lawsuit clients Ian hopes to represent, such as the going-ons of incest
and thievery among his potential clients. Later on, we learn that the
likable good guy of the story, Billy (Bruce) is having an affair with
Alberta.
Ian is very intense, almost over the edge, but he makes sense to these
victims, and he requires no payment if he loses the case, but will be
getting 1/3 of the settlement if he wins. He is able to convince many of
the others involved to retain him (the others, apparently, get another
lawyer), even though there is really no one to blame for the accident,
it was simply the case of Dolores (Gabrielle), the very able driver of
the bus, driving slowly but still hitting an icy spot on the road and
the bus going over the guard rail on the side of the mountain and
sinking in the soft ice below. Ian's argument is that there are no such
things as accidents, someone must be blamed; and if it is not the
driver, then it could be the bus company that might be apt to cut
corners on safety. The important thing, is that they need compensation
for their grief and anger, since their children can't be brought back to
life, then money will have to do. And this we learn, also applies to
himself, as he considers himself a victim just as much as they are,
which is why he thinks that he can easily identify with these parents
and their grief; he has told himself that his daughter is already dead,
and he thinks this is the way he is to get compensated for his grief.
In case you didn't get the thrust of the story from that angle, the
theme of the story is again presented as Nicole (Sarah), the baby sitter
to Billy's kids, reads them a Robert Browning nursery poem, The Pied
Piper, the night before the accident. He's the one who killed all the
rats in town, and when the town refused to pay him, he led all the
children in town away, except the one who was too lame to follow, into a
magical place where everything was strange and new... Nicole survives
the accident but is crippled, ruining her chances of being a rock and
roller, while the kids she baby sat for, die... Billy's habit was to
follow the bus to school, he loved his kids so much, and with his wife's
death, he loved to wave to them as he drove behind them and they would
wave back to him from the back of the bus. Thereby, he witnessed the
accident, and felt drained from it, especially when he was unable to
help as he saw his kids die.
Nicole's parents zealously back the law suit, to the regret of  Billy
and Nicole. Billy vehemently states that this will split the town apart
forever, that there was no one to blame for it, let it be. Nicole's
reasons are more nefarious (it seems ironic that the theme of the poem
she read to Billy's kids, will the next day mirror her situation), and
since she has a poker face, she surprises her seemingly loving parents
and startled lawyer by lying at the deposition.
This all adds up to a brilliant film. One of the best of the recent
lawyer genre films now being made (it is the best one I have seen), and
the only reason it is not a masterpiece, in my opinion, is because it
was too real, something metaphorical about it was lacking; I went away
from the film intellectually gratified, but did not feel the film opened
up the emotional wounds of the locals whereas they would see anything
more about the tragedy than the fact that their lives had been changed;
even if, some of the locals now question their motives to retain a
lawyer, and that is now questioned in a way that it has never been
questioned before. I have no problem with that aspect of the film, that
was convincingly conveyed to me; as was, the lawyer's motives, who comes
across to us as not a good or an evil man, he is a man driven and ripped
apart by guilt, even to the point of  exhibiting bizarre behavior, as he
searches to find a meaning for his life that he doesn't quite understand
anymore, which is apparently more true than his belief that he is so
committed to his work because he is trying to find justice for his
clients; so what we have, what remains for us to ponder, is the fact
that nothing is as simple as the accident is; everyone's life has been
changed and nothing is the same anymore. But the question that still
remains, is what has anyone learned from this, and that is left
lingering because there is an emotional disconnect inbred in  the story,
when all is said and done, and we don't know for sure if anything was
learned. Nevertheless, Atom Egoyan has created a splendid artistic film.
He should be acknowledged by now, as one of our greatest living
filmmakers.
Dennis Schwartz: " OZUS Movie Reviews"        http://www.sover.net/~ozus
=A9 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Kevin Patterson
The Sweet Hereafter  ****
R, 1997
Directed and written by Atom Egoyan. Based on a novel by Russell Banks.
Starring Ian Holm, Caerthan Banks, Sarah Polley.
Whoever saw to it that the story of "The Sweet Hereafter," in which a lawyer
wants to sue for negligence when over a dozen children are killed in a bus
accident in a small town in British Columbia, fell into the hands of
independent Canadian filmmaker Atom Egoyan has done a service to modern
cinema. I can imagine, quite clearly, how a Hollywood studio would have
handled this: first off, we would have seen a slow-motion shot of the bus
skidding off the road. Then the lawyer would arrive and discover that a Greedy
Corporation is to blame for not following safety standards. Then their morally
despicable executives would try, unsucessfully, to quell the lawsuit. Finally,
there would be a resounding courtroom victory with a swell of classical music
in the background.
None of that happens in "The Sweet Hereafter." Egoyan is less concerned with
the accident itself than he is with the townspeople, the lawyer Mitchell
Stephens (Ian Holm), and how they are affected in its aftermath. The story is
not told in linear order, and in fact it is not completely clear until the end
how it all fits together. But this is not simply artsiness for the sake of
artsiness; Egoyan uses this framework to show us more clearly how the
characters are changed by the accident. At the same time, the non-linear
structure works in exactly the opposite way in the examination of Holm's
character; no matter what day or even what year it is, he is always trying to
relate to his estranged drug-addict daughter who sporadically contacts him by
telephone. He is the one character who seems to be a constant, who is always
occupied by the same struggle, whether the film is in flashback, present-day,
or flash-forward.
When Stephens arrives, he is understandably met with skepticism from some of
the residents who think he is exploiting the situation. He certainly knows the
tricks of his trade very well; one of his top priorities is to make sure that
none of his clients or witnesses are in any way disreputable, so as to be sure
that their testimony will be taken seriously. Even when he delivers an
impassioned speech explaining that he seeks to punish whatever person or
corporate entity was responsible for the accident (presumably through
negligence), we still wonder if he is manipulating the grieving parents. It is
not until the situation with his daughter becomes clear that we see otherwise:
having failed to protect or rescue his own child from the dangers of society,
he seeks to protect others and, as he says himself, to give voice to the anger
over tragedies such as the bus accident.
Unfortunately, not everyone in town is quite on the same page, and no one is
perfect either. The couple who first contacted him are emotionally distant
from each other, and the wife (Alberta Watson) has been conducting an affair
with local widower Billy Ansel (Bruce Greenwood). Billy himself sees Stephens
as a threat to the community who is undermining the support that residents had
always provided for each other. One couple seems to share Stephens's desire to
punish those who may have been negligent, but another couple seems to be in it
for the money. The latter couple's daughter Nicole (Sarah Polley), who
survived the accident, begins to wonder if she is being used and starts to
resist, but in a very questionable way. And then there is Stephens himself,
who doesn't really seem to know where to direct the anger of which he speaks.
Never once is he able to explain exactly *who* was negligent in this case - he
is simply determined to sue *somebody*.
"The Sweet Hereafter" is not about who is "right" or "wrong" in this
situation, as most of those involved appear, at the very least, to be acting
out of good intentions. Rather, the film examines the fragility of human
relationships and how a group of people, all trying to do the right thing in
one way or another, end up at odds with each other. There is a certain
stillness and tranquility which Egoyan evokes through his exterior shots of
the rural, snow-bound town, but this sense of peace and acceptance lingers
throughout the film, even after Stephens's shaky alliance starts to crack and
members of the community start to divide against each other. It is as if the
failure of the characters to achieve reconciliation following the accident is
simply an inevitabilty.do the right thing in one way or another, end up at
odds with each other.
This may make the film sound unrelentingly grim, yet the tone of "The Sweet
Hereafter" is not one of nihilistic resignation, but merely one of regret that
only imperfect closure seems to be possible. Some character-centered films
focus on an obviously flawed protagonist and how the person eventually manages
to overcome a clearly negative aspect of his or her life or personality. For
the lead characters in "The Sweet Hereafter" - most notably Stephens, Nicole,
and Billy - the road is not quite so perilous, but none of them quite reach
the end either.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 24 December 1998 with Linda for $8.75 at the Lincoln Plaza Cinema
Perhaps I am turning into a stone, but I was unmoved by *The Sweet
Hereafter*, although it is a beautifully filmed movie. Other reviewers
have described it as elegaic. While it does remind you of an elegy, how
many elegies run feature-length? 
*The Sweet Hereafter* examines the lives of parents just after a fatal
accident in which a bus plunges through a guard rail, careens down an
embankment, and falls through the frozen surface of a lake in British
Columbia. 
The story that drives the movie is the arrival of an attorney, Mitchell
Stephens (Ian Holm) who wants to push some of the grieving parents into
pursuing compensation, that perhaps somehow the senseless tragedy can be
blamed on someone or something; a careless school bus driver, or a faulty
bolt, or something. As if monetary compensation will make up for the loss
of fourteen children. This sort of lawsuit will gain him one-third of the
netted compensation. Also, it means he has to find the "right" sort of pa
rents to testify.
There are also two parallels to the main storyline. First, there is the
irony of Stephens appealing to parents when his own daughter, a drug
addict, is out of control and he can no longer do anything for her. Or, as
he put it, his love for her has become and anger something like "steaming
piss." Also, there is the parallel of the children's story of the Pied
Piper of Hamelin. This is one of the strongest points of the movie. A lot
of the parents in *The Sweet Hereafter* are hardly worthy of their
children, and there is a strong sense of not just sadness but punishment as
well.
Director Atom Egoyan does a good job of showing people after tragedy.
There is a strong sense of the Time Before and the Time After.
Unfortunately, from the beginning of the movie, it is difficult to follow
the timing of the story and the many flashbacks, as there is a lot of
jumping around. Holm is shown having a chance meeting on a plane--a friend
of his daughter--to whom he talks of his daughter's troubles. Where that
fits into the timing of the rest of the story is very difficult. 
I think that because the story is told subtly, and because the characters
seem so low-key and almost stoic, it is hard to really empathize with
them. There is also the taboo of incest, a topic that should have evoked
more emotion, but Egoyan does a lot of filmus interruptus, and the
constant jumping around of flashbacks hurts the full development of
investing in the story and the characters. You are on the edge of tears,
and then suddenly, you are pulled out of the moment. Even when the
characters are fighting, as in the scene where Billy Ansell (Bruce
Greenwood) and Sam Burnell (Tom McCamus) disagree over having a group
lawsuit, there is no intensity. 
A town losing 14 children in a tragedy undoubtedly changes that town
forever, and Egoyan shows the emptiness and sterility very well. It's just
a shame that it was not as moving as it could have been. *The Sweet
Hereafter* left me with the feeling of looking at the carcass of a
wrecked bus, but not knowing anything about the people who perished within
or the people who loved them. Feeling sorry for them is as difficult as
feeling sorry for the people of Hamelin. There is more after than before
to really build the sort of sympathy a movie like this surely wants to
achieve. 
Written by Atom Egoyan, based on a novel by Russell Banks

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
George Wilcox
        There is nothing simple about an Atom Egoyan film. The
Canadian filmmaker excels at challenging the mind as well as the
senses.
           In Egoyan's followup to 1994's excellent "Exotica," Egoyan
adapts Russell Banks' novel about a small British Columbia town
dealing with the tragedy of a school bus crash that killed 14 of the
town's children.
        Just a simple plot summary wrenches the heart, but Egoyan
deals with the subject matter in his trademark fashion as a simple,
lyrical poem. I believe today's closest working director to Ingmar
Bergman is Egoyan. Bille August, a Bergman disciple, comes
close. Egoyan's films, like Bergmans, are psychological and emotional
dramas from the head and the heart. They ask more questions than they
provide and refuse to indulge in simplistic, "My,
aren't-we-all-happy?" endings.
            Like "Exotica," Egoyan attacks the story from many
angles. "The Sweet Hereafter" is told from three time elements: the
present, 1997, when attorney Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) is flying to
meet with his troubled, drugged-out daughter; the recent past, 1995,
when Stephens arrives in town hoping to gather evidence for a
class-action suit after the accident; and then one week earlier at the
time of the crash told from the view of babysitter Nicole Burnell
(Sarah Polley), who survived the accident but now lives as a
paraplegic.
             As in "Exotica," the film centers around the babysitter as the
most important character, the bridge between the adults and the
children.
            Stephens arrives in town with the disturbed belief that he
will help the town get over its grief with a lawsuit. What else would
you expect from a lawyer? As Stephens explains to one couple, "There
is no such thing as an accident. That word doesn't mean a thing to
me."
        But Stephens is dealing with his own grief, the increasingly
distant relationship with his daughter who keeps in contact with him
through desperate phone calls. Egoyan's script calmly builds as Holm's
Stephens realizes the error of his ways by eventually sympathisizing
with the town's folk, not as a lawyer, but as father.
        The film's two discoveries, actually one discover and one
re-discovery, are Polley and Holm. Newcomer Polley, who also appeared
in "Exotica," is mesmerizing as she connects with distraught father
Billy Ansell (Egoyan regular Bruce Greenwood) as the town's only two
citizens questioning Stephens' motivation. Polley even does her own
singing in the film's soundtrack.
          The film's title come from the "Pied Piper of Hamelin," the
children's tale Nicole reads to Billy's children while
babysitting. The parallels between the B.C. town and Hamelin, another
town which lost its children, are on purpose.
          This is the first lead role I can ever remember for veteran
Holm, who has suddenly become a hot property after 1996's "Big Night."
Holm appeared in four 1997 features, but gives one of his best
performances since "Chariots of Fire." He transforms from a
manipulative lawyer planning to capitalize on the town's grief to an
attorney with a conscience. Of course, it's Nicole that helps him make
that transformation.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Atom Egoyan
Cast:  Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Maury Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, Peter
Donaldson, Bruce Greenwood
Screenplay:  Atom Egoyan
Producers:  Atom Egoyan, Camelia Frieberg
Runtime:  110 min.
US Distribution:  Fine Line Features
Rated R:  Language, nudity, adult themes
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
There are good films that I can just sit through and enjoy on a mild
level, slightly removed from the action on screen and never quite
investing myself fully in the picture.  And there are films like Atom
Egoyan's The Sweet Hereafter that remind me of how powerful, how deeply
complex and moving films can be.  Egoyan's picture is a brilliant,
masterful work of cinematic art on absolutely every level.  It encased
me from the opening shot and had me enticed until the last, defining
moment. 
Ian Holm leads the talented cast as Mitchell Stephens, a lawyer who
goes to a small town in Canada where a tragic bus accident has just
killed over twenty children.  The story is non-linear in execution, and
each scene jumps back and forth in time, through various moments before
and after the accident.  Stephens, in what is basically the present-time
of the film, is trying to assemble various members of the community to
form a law suit.  He convinces many of them that the accident was not
actually an "accident," and that someone needs to pay for the tragedy.
Stephens is the main character, but the various other characters make
up the small-town community that is central to the story.  The Sweet
Hereafter frequently shifts back in time to Nicole Burnell (Sarah
Polley), a young woman who is well-liked by the community, and by her
father Sam (Tom McCamus), who is a musician and very proud of his
musical daughter.  Later in the film there are scenes that take place
after the accident, in which we see that Nicole, because of the
accident, has lost the use of her legs.
I can't simply state the plot synopsis of this film, because it's not
about getting from point A to point B, and what the characters do to get
to these moments.  This is a film about the chore of surviving a
harrowing experience, about what it's like to live longer than your
children.  We get the feeling that this community was stable and happy
before the accident, but the good will of the citizens disintegrates
rapidly as Stephens' efforts actually end up separating the community
even more.  
The characters depicted here are realistic, completely fleshed-out, and
excellently portrayed by the cast.  Ian Holm, one of my favorite actors,
is astonishing here.  It is so nice to see him in his first leading role
of his 40-plus year career as a stage and screen actor.  He emits so
much emotion without speaking--his acting is more in his physical
movements than in his voice.  At various points throughout the film, his
daughter, a homeless junkie living on the streets, calls him on his cell
phone as he is interviewing people in the town.  The look on his
face--the way we can see him imploding as he listens to the accusatory
words of his daughter--is something that few actors can pull off.
Sarah Polley is subtle and direct as Nicole.  Her transition from
before the accident to afterwards is just a slight change, but still we
detect a world of difference in her personality.  Bruce Greenwood, who
plays a man who loses two children in the accident, is also very good. 
He tries to start a minor uprising against Stephens; he feels that the
issue should just be left alone.
The narrative structure of The Sweet Hereafter is amazing, and perhaps
what I admire most about it.  Egoyan's screenplay is based on the novel
by Russell Banks, and this seems like the kind of non-linear story that,
on paper, might seem impossible to film.  Not unlike Anthony Minghella's
work on The English Patient, Egoyan manages to tell this story
completely detached from any comprehensible chronology without making it
the slightest bit confusing.  But what is different about this film is
that understanding the timeline isn't important while watching the film.
The altered chronology is not a pointless gimmick:  it serves to make
the story more clear and immersive.  Egoyan does not begin or end the
film with the bus crash (which is a truly disturbing moment when we
finally get to see it), because the film is mostly about the change in
the society--what the accident does to the community.  Stephens, at one
crucial moment, admits why the case is so important to him (doubling as
an explanation to the audience as to why he is the main character): 
"We've all lost our children," he says.  Simple, direct, and true.
And that is exactly what The Sweet Hereafter is.  There is not even a
hint of manipulative sentimentality in Egoyan's film.  Swelling,
saddening music is common in films that deal with tragedies, but here
the score (by Mychael Danna) is not overpowering and adds just enough
color in each scene to match cinematographer Paul Sarossy's breathtaking
imagery.  This film is not about how awful a tragedy like this can be,
but how torturous surviving it can be.  In all of its simplicity, in the
realistic and sympathetic way Egoyan observes these unfortunate men in
women, The Sweet Hereafter is a moving, disturbing picture on levels
that most films don't even touch.  

Author
David N. Butterworth
Towards the middle of "The Sweet Hereafter," a crowded school bus skids on
an icy road surface as it rounds a bend, careens through the steel guard
rail, and disappears out of sight.  Then, in long shot, we see the vehicle
slowly sliding across what looks like a snow-covered field.  It pauses for
a moment before the "field" cracks under the bus' weight and the bright
yellow vehicle vanishes in an effortless moment, a single smooth second of
time.
Compare that scene, if you will, to the last eighty minutes of "Titanic,"
when the behemoth sinks slowly and spectacularly to its watery demise, and
you'll appreciate the futility of comparing greatness in films.
The scene in "The Sweet Hereafter" epitomizes all that's right with
independent Canadian director Atom Egoyan's film.  It's not sensational.
We don't see the inside of the bus with its payload of screaming, terrified
children being bloodied and battered about.  The bus doesn't explode or
break into a thousand tiny pieces.  It simply leaves the road and silently
slips beneath the surface of a frozen lake.  It's a horrifying sequence
made all the more so by calm and distance.
Using a non-linear approach to his narrative, Egoyan shifts back and
forward in time, connecting us with the inhabitants of the small British
Columbian town who have been severely affected by this tragedy.  Fourteen
children died in the accident, leaving their parents and the town itself
paralyzed with grief.
The catalyst at the center of the film is ambulance chaser Mitchell
Stephens (a wonderfully moving performance by Ian Holm), who comes to Sam
Dent to persuade the townsfolk to engage in a class action suit.
Stephens, who "doesn't believe in accidents," functions as a concerned,
involved observer, scribbling details in his notebook and providing the
parents with an opportunity to reach some kind of closure in the harrowing
aftermath.  While Stephens' initial drive may be financial (one third of
the total settlement if he wins), his involvement provides him more with an
outlet to come to grips with his own loss.  His self-destructive,
drug-addicted daughter has been in and out of clinics, halfway houses and
detox units for years.
Egoyan's attention to detail and ability to establish mood are so
impeccable that even the sound of a kettle boiling resonates like a
plaintive cry.  Mychael Danna, who composed the shimmering music for "The
Ice Storm," contributes another memorable score that shivers and tingles.
Equally impressive is Paul Sarossy's cinematography, capturing the imposing
Canadian mountainsides and low-hanging fogs as splendidly as his shadowy
interiors--in one scene a bright wall calendar serves to illuminate
portions of a room.
"The Sweet Hereafter," while undeniably grim, urges the viewer to grab onto
life with both hands and not let go.  It's a film of generous subtlety and
emotion.

Author
Frankie Paiva
Has there ever been a film so spectacular and so wonderful that you have ever
been afraid to write a review for it? A picture show with a story so
fantastically woven into a great motion picture experience? If the slightest
word could set off someone or do disrespect to the film? This is exactly the
way I feel about The Sweet Hereafter which has just joined my Top 5 favorite
films of all time.
Mitchell Stephens (Holm) is a lawyer who has gone to a snowy town where
fourteen kids have died in a bus crash. He suggests that something was wrong
with the bus, and wants to file a claims suit for the damages experienced by
the families. He interviews various parents and victims of the crash including
Nicole (Polley) who has been confined to a wheelchair. 
But Mitchell soons finds these problems connecting to what's happening in his
life with his troubled daughter. He learns certain lessons here that can help
him towards bettering the life of his family. He also has to deal with people
who are living in the past and cannot move on.
But it's not just the great screenplay (which was Oscar nominated) and the
great characters that appear that make this film what it is. It's the way the
film is shot. For some scenes, Egoyan fills the screen with people's mouth
quivering as they talk to one another, and rather then letting the film start
with the bus crash and have all of the conversations follow it, the film tells
the story is a weird sort of way, flashing back between after the accident,
before the accident, and the present day. 
The film has robbed of all of the two Oscars it got nominated for. Where was
the Best Picture nomination? Where were the Supporting Actress and Best Actor
nods? Who cares about Titanic? I cried much more often in this than I did in
that. You need to see this film now! This instant! Go! Go to Blockbuster and
see The Sweet Hereafter which gets **** stars.
The Young-Uns: Brief frontal female nudity and some breasts are present as well
as some mild language. Good Age: 14 & Up
A Review by Frankie Paiva
The 12 Year-Old Movie Reviewer
E-Mail me at SwpStke@aol.com
Visit my website at: http://expage.com/page/teenagemoviecritic

Author
Walter Frith
Director Atom Egoyan has made not only his finest film but his most
important statement yet with 'The Sweet Hereafter'.  Also written for
the screen by Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks, the film is a
grim tale of a small Canadian town struggling to get on with their
emotional lives after a bus accident in the town kills a group of
children.  This immense tragedy, told out of sequence, is told without
the trappings of the usual Hollywood standard, using no heroic
characters to bring justice to an injustice, using no courtroom scenes
with all their pretentious speech making and most importantly the film
moves in a dreamlike manner to echo the depressing manner of a
nightmare.
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), is a lawyer who is not out to be a heroic
star like he might be in a big Hollywood studio production.  He is an
honest and somewhat humble individual who makes contact with the
families of the deceased youngsters in the hopes of bringing a class
action suit against someone involved with the bus company.  Through a
calculated series of visits he begins to slowly turn the grief of the
families into a more intense anger than they're already feeling and I'm
sure his motives are all for the best because he is convinced there is
more to the incident than just a simple accident.  Stephens is facing
alienation from his own daughter as she eludes him to pursue a life of
depravity by becoming a drug addict, traveling with derelicts and
eventually testing positive for the AIDS virus.  Through several
telephone contacts he has with her in the film, the audience is drawn to
feel as if they aren't father and daughter at all although the film
makes it clear that they are through a brief series of flashbacks
involving Holm's care for his child when she was an infant.
More powerful than anything in the film is the intense bonding we see
between some of the parents and their children and the eventual
separation they encounter through death. Another character, Nicole
(Sarah Polley) is older than the other children who died and is confined
to a wheelchair, paralyzed from the waist down after the wreck.  Her
hopes of becoming a rock star are quickly dashed by her predicament and
she is instrumental in the film's outcome as her deposition given to the
case may decide things.  Her character is the most sympathetic and is
the best supporting performance in the film.  As for Ian Holm, I was
overwhelmed by his performance as the lawyer who wants to reach out and
also be a friend to the families.  Just one look at him tells you his
underlining concern is not profit but concern.  The performances of both
Holm and Polley are well worth Oscar nominations as is Egoyan's
direction and the film itself is a worthy contender for Best Picture..
The most impressive thing about Egoyan's direction of the film is the
way each family involved in the tragedy is interviewed and confronted by
Stephens.  The individual frustration each one of them feels and in the
case of the bus driver, guilt, is a testament to Egoyan's ability to
make a real story work by making each character as important as any
other.  This is as real a film as you'll ever see with the most searing
dramatic overtones you're ever likely to encounter in the movies.
Visit 'FILM FOLLOW-UP' by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Michael J. Legeros
    Ian Holm (THE FIFTH ELEMENT, BIG NIGHT) stars in this quiet, quirky
Canadian drama about a remote British Columbia community, a school bus
accident that kills a chunk of their children, and the ready-to-sue
ambulance-chaser (Holm) who arrives in short order.  Writer/director
Atom Egoyan (EXOTICA), adapting from the novel by Russell Banks, con-
trasts the town's collective grief with Holm's character's struggle to
accept the loss of his own child-- a drug-addicted daughter that he
can't keep from loving, no matter how many times she breaks his heart.
Heavy stuff, but Egoyan has a few tricks up his sleeve to keep the po-
tentially wrenching drama at a discretionary distance.  (The non-linear
story structure, with its interwoven flashbacks, in one such device.) 
A remarkably centered performance by Holm is the centerpiece of this
absorbing and, at times, haunting film.  (I was moved, but not to tears.
Then again, I'm not a parent, either.)  Gorgeous winter photography,
too, by Paul Sarossy.  With Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus,
Gabrielle Rose, Arsinee Khanjian, SPANKING THE MONKEY's Alberta Watson,
and a surprisingly menacing Maury Chaykin.

Author
James Sanford
THE SWEET HEREAFTER
(Fine Line Features)
 The key scene in "The Sweet Hereafter" includes one of the most disturbing
images you're likely to see this year: a schoolbus full of children plunges
over a bank, rolls out onto a frozen lake and pauses for a few seconds
before the ice underneath it gives way and the bus and its passengers
disappear into the frigid water below. It's a  moment that will change the
people of the tiny Canadian town of Sam Dent forever, as the once-insular
community begins to turn upon itself with neighbor betraying neighbor in a
race for justice, money and, the most elusive thing of all, peace of mind.
 Based on the acclaimed novel by Russell Banks, "The Sweet Hereafter" is
both deeply disturbing and almost relentlessly grim, which is hardly
unexpected, given the subject matter. The true surprise is director Atom
Egoyan's approach to the material. In the hands of Hollywood, this might
have been sensationalistic; at the very least it would have been ripe with
scenes of hysterical parents and angry townsfolk. But Egoyan finds in Banks'
book a fable, a story about the journey from shock to grief to renewal, "the
sweet hereafter" of the title. Late in the film, Robert Browning's "The Pied
Piper of Hamelin" is read as a bedtime story, and it becomes a perfect
metaphor for the strange chain of events that have pulled Sam Dent apart.
 The man largely responsible for the dissent is Mitchell Stephens (Ian
Holm), a lawyer from out of town who arrives in Sam Dent hoping to put
together a class-action lawsuit against the manufacturer of the bus. A
seasoned pro, Stephens knows exactly the right words to say to move these
small-towners to his side. "I'm here to give your anger a voice," he tells
the distraught parents of one of the victims. "There's no such thing as an
accident. The word doesn't mean anything to me." That's a lie, of course: To
Stephens the accident means a potential financial windfall if he can win the
case, which will ultimately turn largely on the testimony of Nicole (Sarah
Polley), a gifted young singer who survived the crash but has been left
crippled. Nicole's father Sam (Tom McCamus), with whom she's had an odd and
possibly incestuous relationship, is among the most money-hungry in the
community, although it's difficult to tell whether he wants compensation
because of Nicole's injuries or because of her new aloofness toward him.
 Stephens, too, has a difficult time with his own daughter, a drug-dazed
wanderer named Zoe (Caerthan Banks) who calls him frequently on his cellular
phone, demanding money and attention in between lies. It is this aspect of
Stephens that allows Egoyan to show us the man's secret heart and
well-shrouded grief. Obviously, Stephens' quest for remuneration for the
parents of Sam Dent is fueled at least partially by his realization that he
has in fact lost his own child, who's become one of the living dead.
 The acting is mostly low-key and understated, in keeping with the film's
tone. Holm and Polley are particularly moving, but Bruce Greenwood, as one
of the few citizens to resist Stephens' spell, is also memorable.  As in
Egoyan's previous film "Exotica," the director paints this picture
deliberately and somewhat abstractly, which may frustrate those who prefer
to have everything spelled out and clarified. In some spots, "The Sweet
Hereafter" is almost too oblique for its own good, particularly in a finale
that almost seems to smack of "The X Files." But Egoyan also conjures up
some powerful scenes, such as when Stephens interviews Dolores (Gabrielle
Rose), the bus driver who's become a town pariah since the accident, and
whose living room wall is adorned with framed photos of each of the kids on
the bus, staring out at her like a gallery of little ghosts. James Sanford

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE SWEET HEREAFTER
(Fine Line)
Starring:  Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, Gabrielle
Rose, Alberta Watson, Stephanie Morganstern, Caerthan Banks.
Screenplay:  Atom Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks.
Producers:  Atom Egoyan and Camelia Frieberg.
Director:  Atom Egoyan.
MPAA Rating:  R (nudity, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  112 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     It's not often that a film inspires me to use the adjective
"sublime," but there's no better word to describe what Atom Egoyan has
accomplished in THE SWEET HEREAFTER.  Most films about tragic subjects
appear to be driven by a fear that emotions writ small will leave an
audience hungry for grand catharsis, so they attack with teary-eyed
embraces and a swelling John Williams score.  Egoyan refuses to turn on a
warning light when he's about to go for your emotions.  When he does, he
catches them almost as unguarded as the emotions of his characters.
     No other approach could have worked the same mournful, hypnotic
magic Egoyan delivers in THE SWEET HEREAFTER.  The setting is a small town
in British Columbia devastated by a school bus accident which claimed the
lives of twenty children.  Into the still shell-shocked town steps
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), an attorney who wants to represent the
children's parents in a civil negligence suit.  Many of the parents
respond to Stephens and come on board quickly.  Others, like Billy Ansel
(Bruce Greenwood), want nothing to do with Stephens.  After all, he's just
an ambulance-chaser preying on the community's need for someone to hold
accountable for their pain.  Isn't he?
     Well, like most things in Atom Egoyan films, the obvious answer
usually isn't the right one.  Through a masterful use of overlapping and
interwoven time frames, Egoyan gradually reveals details about the
characters which cloud every motivation.  Stephens, we learn, is tormented
by the fate of his own daughter Zoe (Caerthan Banks), a drug addict who
contacts him only when desperate for money.  The roles of other characters
in the story also unfold in bits and pieces:  Nicole (Sarah Polley), a
teen-aged survivor of the crash; Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose), the
bus driver who can't help speaking of some of the victims in the present
tense; Nicole's father Sam (Tom McCamus); Billy and married motel manager
Risa (Alberta Watson).  Egoyan's story-telling demands that you pay
attention, forces you to draw conclusions, and allows you to feel without
telling you _how_ to feel.
     He's also a director who can startle you with his confident refusals
to make the obvious choice.  Nowhere is this more evident than his
depiction of the bus accident itself.  The moment is gripping and
devastating in a completely unpredictable way because of what we see, what
we don't see, and the context in which it is framed.  The scene becomes a
shocking and indelible image of parental helplessness, as does Ian Holm's
bravura monologue in which Stephens describes a medical emergency which
threatens Zoe's life as an infant.  Egoyan portrays the deep, powerful and
often illogical emotions of parenthood from several different
perspectives, each one performed to perfection, each one with different
wrenching consequences.
     One of Egoyan's riskier choices is also one of the few which doesn't
pay off.  Several scenes in THE SWEET HEREAFTER are accompanied by Nicole
reading passages from "The Pied Piper of Hamelin," an extended metaphor
which grows less effective each time it's used.  On screen, with the
persistence of a voice, the comparison occasionally feels forced; I can
imagine the device working much more effectively in the Russell Banks
novel on which the film is based (and which I haven't read), as an entry
or exit point to a chapter.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is still a remarkably
literary film in the best sense of the word, perhaps the most novel-like
film since John Sayles' LONE STAR.  What Egoyan adds cinematically -- from
Mychael Danna's otherworldly score to the ambiguity-enhancing final shot
-- turns THE SWEET HEREAFTER into one of the year's most powerful works.
And, in all probability, the most sublime.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
THE SWEET HEREAFTER is not the first film I have cried in, but certainly one
of the few where I felt unashamed of what I was being invited to weep over.
This is one of the best films ever made about the uncertainty of how to live
in the face of death and tragedy.  it is not a tearjerker that works with
dumb gimmicks like a terminal disease or a cute animal; it simply states a
condition, with merciless detail, and asks that we empathize.  We do.  It is
one of the best films about "the human condition" -- what a weatherbeaten
way to talk about life and death! -- since Kurosawa's IKIRU.
Somewhere in Canada, a township has suffered a terrible accident.  A busload
of fourteen schoolchildren went off the road, and all of them save two --
one student and the driver -- were killed.  A lawyer, Mitchell Stephens (Ian
Holm, in easily the best performance he has ever given), comes to this town
to represent the citizens in a class action suit.  Maybe they can get
something back -- not their children, certainly (and one of the citizens
tells him, bluntly, that there's nothing Stephens can do for him unless he
can raise the dead), but something is better than nothing, yes?
Stephens is himself in mourning for his own child.  His daughter is not
dead, but a drug addict, and in a way that's worse -- he gets to hear her
voice without being able to do anything to really help her, since she's
proven time and again that she's not trustable.  The first time we see him,
he's locked in a car wash, talking to his daughter on the cell phone.  She
is stuck in some unnamed city, trying to hustle him for more drug money.  He
mouths one nicety after another mechanically.  Holm's performance is fearful
and excellent, and only one of several excellent ones in this film.
The movie is not a formula legal thriller where everything hinges on some
plot twist or piece of hidden evidence, but rather a story about pain that
cannot be healed or dispelled with social mechanisms like lawsuits.  The
parents of some of the surviving children are depicted in spare, carefully
assembled scenes.  Some of them are hungry for any chance at redemption at
all, like the parents of the adopted Indian boy (Earl Pastko and Arsinee
Khanjian).  Some are bitter and numb, like the father who witnessed the
accident (Bruce Greenwood).  Some have lost just enough to know they are not
the only ones suffering, like the parents (Tom McCamus and Brooke Johnson)
whose talented daughter is now confined to a wheelchair for life.
Nicole (Sarah Polley), the girl singer, is a pivotal character, but for
reasons that sneak up on us gradually.  At first we think her character is
just going to be another meditation on soldiering on through life, no matter
what we're given, but the accident has done more than cripple her -- it's
starved her of a whole group of friends and peers.  (The movie uses the poem
"The Pied Piper" to great and tragic effect here -- a device that sounds
corny, but strikes like a hammer blow when its real meaning surfaces.)  She
is lonely, and wounded because of that.  Her performance, too, is excellent
-- she's not so emotionally distant that we feel annoyed for wanting to
empathize with her in the first place.
The story is drawn from a novel by Russell Banks, who had four of the main
characters tell the story in separate monologues.  The director, the gifted
Atom Egoyan, has chosen to take the book apart and reassemble it in a way
that jumps back and forth through time, but he does not use black and white
vs. color or other cheap cinematographic tricks to discern the past from the
present.  He simply lets each scene dictate its presence in the story's
whole through its emotional resonances, through what is shown and what is
only implied, and the result is incredibly nuanced and rich.
One of the ways we see the movie expose itself piece by piece is in a series
of scenes that take place on the flight back from the town.  Here, Holm's
character confesses a great deal about his daughter to a friend -- and in a
scene of utterly astounding emotional power, talks about when his daughter
almost died of an insect bite when she was a baby, and how he was confronted
with the possibility of having to perform an emergency tracheotomy on her
with a pocketknife.  The way this scene is deployed and the way Ian Holm's
voice ties it together and pushes it forward is masterful and heartbreaking,
not the least of which because he has saved her life before and now finds
himself saying about her, "I gave her all the love the father of a drug
addict could spare."
The film is also startlingly lovely.  I had the chance to read the script
before seeing the movie, and wondered: Would this just be a movie where the
characters sit around and talk to each other?  No; the town is seen in
elegantly composed shots that are like Wyeth paintings.  Egoyan has filmed
everything in a way that makes the events stand out starkly and brilliantly
on the screen, and has managed to find the colors in everything he points
the camera at without being flashy or distracting.  The only indulgence he
permits himself is in the very last shot, and by that time he's earned it.
And then there are those final scenes, in which we see the whole sad affair
of the lawsuit disintegrating as a key witness apparently falsifies a
testimony.  Why?  Since this is not a movie with a lockstep, closed-ended
plot, it's almost unfair to ask a question like that.  Some things cannot be
healed, the movie seems to be saying, and must simply be turned away from.
But some of us, sadly, cannot turn away, and are blinded as we look on.

Author
James Kendrick
director: Atom Egoyan
screenwriter: Atom Egoyan (based on the novel by Russell Banks)
stars: Ian Holm (Russell Stephens), Bruce Greenwood (Billy Ansell),
Gabrielle Rose (Dolores Driscoll), Sarah Polley (Nicole Burnell), Tom
McCamus (Sam Burnell), Brooke Johnson (Mary Burnell), Maury Chaykin
(Wendell Walker), Alberta Watson (Risa Walker), Arsinee Khanjian (Wanda
Otto), Earl Pastko (Hartley Otto), Stephanie Morgenstern (Allison),
Caerthan Banks (Zoe Stephens)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **** (out of ****)
In "The Sweet Hereafter," writer/director Atom Egoyan takes us beyond
the tragedy of death into the tragedy of living. He shows us how it
isn't dying that hurts, but rather the pain of living in the hereafter
of death, and dealing with the loss and grief that it brings.
On a cold winter day in a small, isolated town in British Columbia, a
school bus full of children slides off the highway and onto a frozen
lake, where it cracks through the ice and sinks. Fourteen children die,
and numerous others are hurt. For the residents of this small town, all
of whose children were on that bus, it is an earth-shattering event that
resolutely alters their lives. They have always relied on each other in
the past to deal with heartache and pain, but it seems that this tragedy
is more than they can handle.
Alberta and Risa Walker, who own a local motel and lost their child in
the accident, hire an attorney named Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) to
bring a lawsuit against someone, anyone for responsibility. The bus
driver, Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose), is a kindly woman who loved
the children and, although she lives with a burden of guilt, is not held
responsible for the accident. The bus seems to have simply slipped on
some ice, and there was nothing should could do to prevent it.
However, according to Stephens, there are no "accidents" in life, and
someone will pay for this tragedy, whether that be the manufacturer of
the bus or the guardrail the bus broke through. He goes through the
town, approaching the parents who have lost children, asking them to
join the class action suit and find vent for their anger. And, for his
work, Stephens will receive one-third of the settlement money.
However, it is immediately apparent that Stephens has little or no
interest in the money. He is driven by something else, something deeper
that he shares in common with the grieving parents. He has lost a child,
too, but not in the same manner. His daughter, Zoe (Caerthan Banks), who
once almost died in his arms as a young child after a spider bite, has
been in and out of drug re-hab clinics and detox stations for ten years.
She calls him on an irregular basis, begging him for money, but refusing
to tell him what she needs it for. "I don't know who I'm taking to," he
tells her. In his mind, his daughter is dead.
The lawsuit is, to Stephens, not only a way to mend the town's pain, but
also his own. However, not everyone in town wants it to happen. Billy
Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), who was driving behind the bus when the
accident happened and lost two children, wants nothing to do with it. He
has already lost his wife, and he buries his grief in an affair with a
married woman. He doesn't want to talk about the accident, and he sees
the lawsuit as nothing more than the unnecessary opening of old wounds.
To him, the town should be able to take care of its own pain, and it
doesn't need outsiders like Stephens getting in the way.
Central to "The Sweet Hereafter" is the tale of Nicole Burnell (Sarah
Polley), a teenage girl who dreams of being a singer before the accident
turned her into "a wheelchair girl," as she puts it. Aside from
Stephens, Nicole is the most complex character in the film, and it is
she who ultimately decides the fate of the town and how the lawsuit will
turn out.
It is also her sad, haunted voice that we often hear on the soundtrack,
reading Robert Browning's poem about the Pied Piper, and how when he led
all the town's children away, one was left behind because he was
crippled. Obviously, Nicole is that child, and she feels somehow
betrayed that the rest of the town's children left her alone by dying in
the wreck.
Her situation is further complicated because she is involved in a
loving, but incestuous relationship with her father (Tom McCamus). There
is only one, fleeting scene that suggests this relationship, but it is
somehow tied into the final act of the film. Of all the storylines in
"The Sweet Hereafter," this is the most complicated and unresolved,
although its implications stretch throughout the entirety of the film.
Egoyan knows that the kinds of questions he brings up have no simple
answers -- if any at all -- and he doesn't condescend to the audience by
trying to neatly wrap it up.
What Egoyan has done in "The Sweet Hereafter" is really nothing short of
miraculous. In his adaptation of the novel by Russell Banks, he has made
a deeply moving film about a lawyer by transcending the pettiness of law
and driving headlong into the deeper meaning of what is loss, and how
pitiful monetary and material possessions are when compared to human
life.
Egoyan has always been a talented, but distant and cerebral filmmaker
whose work suffered only in that it felt so cold. "The Sweet Hereafter"
is quite the opposite; Egoyan's stylistic and narrative structures work
brilliantly to heighten the impact of the natural emotion, and draw the
audience into the tragedy. "The Sweet Hereafter" seems to contain the
combined emotional impact that all his other films lacked.
The film is filled with beautiful, subtle performances from all the
actors, especially Ian Holm as the lawyer and Sarah Polley as the sad
child who was left behind. The beautiful, roving camerawork by Paul
Sarossy and the haunting, melodic musical score by Mychael Danna (both
previous Egoyan collaborators) give the film a visual and aural
cohesiveness with the thematic elements.
Like his earlier films, Egoyan weaves together multiple storylines that
form a blanketing whole. He works with time as a fluid substance,
shifting back and forth between the past, the distant past, and the
present with effortless ease. The actual bus wreck itself doesn't happen
until midway through the film, but by that time the event has built up
so much emotion that Egoyan can film it from a distance with no graphic
detail, and still have it carry great, devastating weight.
Because human life has become such a cheap commodity in movies, it is
astounding that Egoyan can convey so much heartbreak in such simple,
direct terms. Certainly one of the best films of 1997, "The Sweet
Hereafter" is a deeply rewarding, mystifying, and ultimately human film.


Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, 
      Gabrielle Rose, Arsinee Khanjian, Alberta Watson, Maury Chaykin
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producers: Atom Egoyan and Camelia Frieberg
Screenplay: Atom Egoyan based on the novel by Russell Banks
Cinematography: Paul Sarossy
Music: Mychael Danna
U.S. Distributor: Fine Line Features
     THE SWEET HEREAFTER is film maker Atom Egoyan's most compelling 
movie to date.  Amplifying many of the themes explored in his previous 
outing, EXOTICA, the Canadian director/writer/producer shows the 
powerful effects of grief and anger on a community devastated by an 
unspeakable tragedy.  During the course of this 110-minute, emotionally-
turbulent experience, Egoyan doesn't ask any easy questions or propose 
any pat answers.  This is film making at its most powerful:  drama 
capable of shaking the soul, yet free of even the slightest hint of 
manipulation, sentimentality, or mawkishness.  The movie has an impact 
that extends far beyond the walls of a movie theater  a quality shared 
by a distressingly few of today's releases.
     Egoyan began making films with 1984's NEXT OF KIN, a critical 
success that earned him a nomination for Canada's Best Director Genie 
Award.  He followed NEXT OF KIN with FAMILY VIEWING, SPEAKING PARTS, THE 
ADJUSTER, and CALENDAR, all of which shared certain common traits, 
including a wildly elliptical style, themes of emotional isolation, and 
a degree of distance between the characters and the audience.  Egoyan's 
early movies, although intellectually stimulating and fascinating to 
observe from a critical standpoint, were emotionally dissatisfying.  
However, the director's next effort, the much-lauded EXOTICA, broke down 
the character/audience barrier, and, at the time, proved to be Egoyan's 
most challenging effort.  Yet, as forceful as EXOTICA was, it was only 
an appetizer for THE SWEET HEREAFTER.
     As with all of the other Egoyan-directed movies, THE SWEET 
HEREAFTER involves more than one storyline, although the internal 
connections are less oblique here than in the previous features.  This 
could easily be viewed as Egoyan's most commercial work thus far. It is 
certainly his most accessible.  There are those who would equate words 
like "commercial" and "accessible" with the term "creative compromise," 
but nothing could be further from the truth.  Although Egoyan's methods 
may have become more mainstream, his message is richer and more complex 
than ever.
     The central event of THE SWEET HEREAFTER is a school bus accident 
that results in the death of fourteen children and the injury of many 
others.  On a cold winter's day in the small town of Sam Dent, British 
Columbia, the driver loses control of the vehicle and it careens off the 
road onto a frozen lake which gives way beneath the weight.  The scene 
of the bus sinking into the water  a stark, simple shot  is one of the 
most painfully effective and disturbing sequences in any film this year.  
The impact is further enhanced by presenting the fatal moment from the 
perspective of an impotent father.  Death has become such a cheap, 
bloody commodity in modern movies that viewing a scene like this is a 
revelation. 
     Since Egoyan eschews linear storytelling by allowing time to be 
fluid rather than fixed, we don't see the actual accident until midway 
through the movie.  The opening scene introduces us to Mitchell Stephens 
(Ian Holm), an ambulance-chaser who has come to Sam Dent to persuade the 
victims' parents to join in a class action lawsuit.  He promises 
financial compensation for their losses, claiming that while no one can 
offer an outlet for their grief, he can be the voice of their anger.  In 
fact, Mitchell knows something about those emotions.  His daughter, Zoe 
(Caerthan Banks), is a drug addict on the road to self-destruction.  All 
of the fury bubbling within Mitchell becomes focused into his work in 
Sam Dent.  But there is no clear culprit to sue for the bus accident, 
and Mitchell is groping for a villain who doesn't exist.  Parents join 
him in the vain hope that money will soothe the pain or bring some sort 
of "closure," but the greed for compensation fractures the community.
     Other players in the drama include Nicole Burnell (Sarah Polley), 
one of the accident survivors.  She's a teenage, would-be rock star who 
loses the use of her legs because of the experience, and who becomes the 
corner stone of Mitchell's case.  As the victim of incest, however, she 
is a damaged individual.  Her parents, Sam (Tom McCamus) and Mary 
(Brooke Johnson), are among the lawyer's most eager clients.  Two others 
involved in the suit are Wanda and Hartley Otto (Arsinee Khanjian and 
Earl Pastko), who lost an adopted child in the crash.  Risa and Wendell 
Walker (Alberta Watson and Maury Chaykin), whose only son perished 
beneath the cold waters, have also signed with Mitchell.  But Risa's 
lover, Billy Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), reject's Mitchell's advances.  
Having recently lost his wife, Billy is acquainted with grief, and this 
enables him to accept the death of his twin children, rather than wallow 
in denial.  Finally, there's Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose), the 
longtime bus driver who must live with the weight of responsibility for 
what happened.
     THE SWEET HEREAFTER is based on the novel by Russell Banks, but 
Egoyan has infused it with his own inimitable style.  One of the film 
maker's more successful innovations is to make explicit comparisons 
between the situation in Sam Dent (the loss of the children) and the one 
in the Robert Browning poem, "The Pied Piper of Hamelin."  In the "Pied 
Piper," the lone crippled boy left behind by the Piper forever regretted 
his exclusion from a land where "everything was strange and new."  It 
could be argued that, in THE SWEET HEREAFTER, the abandoned one is 
Nicole.  The sweet hereafter is the strange, new land that her 
schoolmates reach, but which she has not yet attained.
     The most intriguing character is Mitchell.  The best-developed of 
all of THE SWEET HEREAFTER's numerous multifaceted individuals, Mitchell 
proves to be a sympathetic figure even though his influence is negative.  
The lawyer is not only after a quick buck (he gets 1/3 of the proceeds 
from any favorable settlement), but he believes that his own tragedy 
forges an emotional link between him and the residents of Sam Dent.  
What he can't see, however, is that his private agenda is tearing 
asunder the fabric of the community.  Personal demons and an obsession 
to assuage his own guilt, not a need to see justice done, drive 
Mitchell.
     As always, Egoyan has assembled a top-notch cast.  Ian Holm paints 
a powerful and stirring portrait of Mitchell as a haunted, hurting 
figure whose inner torment touches our hearts.  Holm acts with his eyes 
and face, as well as with his voice and actions.  The actor's shining 
moment is when Mitchell relates the story of how, as an infant, his 
daughter nearly died from a spider bite.  It is during this scene, more 
than any other, that the audience truly connects with a character that, 
under other circumstances, might be worthy of disdain.
     Most of the other performers are Egoyan regulars.  As always, the 
director's wife, Arsinee Khanjian, is on hand.  Bruce Greenwood, playing 
a role not unlike the one he essayed in EXOTICA, is again a grieving 
father.  Sarah Polley, who was also in EXOTICA (she was a babysitter), 
has a more complex role here.  In addition to portraying Nicole, Polley 
contributes the vocals to many of the songs heard throughout the film, 
including the one that plays over the closing credits.  Other familiar 
faces from previous Egoyan features include Gabrielle Rose, Maury 
Chaykin, and David Hemblen (as Dolores the bus driver's husband).  
Alberta Watson, who made a strong impression as the mother in SPANKING 
THE MONKEY, is Risa Walker.
     One of the many tangential aspects of THE SWEET HEREAFTER is to 
illustrate the shallowness of the numerous John Grisham movies.  
Compared to Egoyan's thoughtful and potent examination of the role of a 
lawyer in society, even THE RAINMAKER, the best adaptation of a Grisham 
novel to date, seems flat and unconvincing.  Egoyan has given us a 
powerful motion picture that resonates on every level.  The most amazing 
thing about THE SWEET HEREAFTER is not the style, the acting, or the 
cinematography (all of which are exceptional), but the way the film 
successfully juggles so many themes, persuading us to reflect upon them 
all before the 110 minute running time is up.  This is truly a great 
film  easily one of 1997's best.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"For me, the cinema is not a slice of life, but a piece of cake."

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Atom Egoyan makes complex that often fit together like puzzles.
His EXOTICA was a complex story that was never complete until the final
scene made sense of things.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is not so tightly
wound, but it is very tightly bound emotionally and still a puzzle.
With this film Egoyan takes a close hard look at a cold British
Columbia town in mourning after almost an entire generation of its
children was wiped out in a tragic school bus accident.  As the
community tries to heal itself and carry on after the loss it is
visited by a smooth and vaguely sinister lawyer.  Mitchell Stephens
(played by Ian Holm) implants in the minds of the townspeople that what
is called for is not peace but a vengeful class action lawsuit.  He
convinces the locals that their should be no forgiveness for the guilty
and that whenever there is an accident of this sort, there is always
somebody who is guilty.  There is always somebody who should be made to
pay. He is the lawyer that they want to get them that payment and he
will keep only a third for himself.
     In the hands of a lesser director Mitchell could easily be reduced
to being a one-dimensional devil.  The script, written as well as
directed by Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks, dissects that
character of Stephens.  Stephens has a daughter on drugs and willing to
do any self-destructive action to spite her father. For this daughter
Stephens feels an icy helplessness and a sort of frozen rage.  Icy and
calculated are all of his reactions in an Oscar-worthy performance.  In
the course of the film we learn a great deal about him and where and
how he lost his emotions.  A major theme explored in this film, and
there are several, is things that are out of people's control and
feelings of utter helplessness.  There is some fascination with the
understated way that Stephens does his job.  He searches for the
parents who can best make a winning case for him and are the most
susceptible to being won over.  He also carefully checks them out for
weaknesses that could harm his case.
     Egoyan has some nice stylistic moves.  The bleak Canadian winter
seems to pervade the entire film and reflect the coldness of the people
in the town who have isolated themselves from their emotions.  The icy
weather acts upon people and performs its own mischief including the
central tragedy of the film. Conversations in the film are anything but
volatile.  People seem to think out their next response with notable
pauses in the conversion.  Then the film returns again and again to the
theme of the Pied Piper.  On one level the town has lost its children,
disappearing not into a hole in a mountain that closes up but into a
hole in the ground that also closes.  On another level the grief of the
parents has made them vulnerable to the outsider who wishes to lead
them to where they might not otherwise not want to go.  Egoyan holds
off on showing the viewer the actual accident until late in the film.
He shows it with a frightening simplicity. No dramatic music.  The
school bus just skids over the curb on a hill and out of sight slips
down a hill onto a frozen pond where it slowly sinks.  But it has a
greater emotional impact than some of the fiery crashes we have seen
elsewhere this year.
     This is a film I expect to see on several best of the year lists,
including my own.  I suspect that it will not be remembered at Oscar
time, being a modest Canadian film, but it certainly is one of the best
of the year and will be on my top then list.  I rate it a +8 on the 0
to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Randy Turgeon
A small Canadian town copes with a terrible tragedy when a school bus
slips off an icy road and plunges into a river killing most of the
children on board. A lawyer, Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) arrives
shortly after to convince the suffering parents that they should sue
for damages. Who exactly they should sue is not a concern for Stephens
yet. He will blame someone.
Stephens interviews the parents and survivors with varied success to
his cause.  Most of the parents, including Delores Driscoll (Gabrielle
Rose) the bus driver who survived the crash, join Stephens in his
lawsuit. Others are not so convinced, including Billy Ansell (Bruce
Greenwood) who lost both of his children and refuses to help, feeling
that the lawsuit will divide the once peaceful community, and Nicole
Burnell (Sarah Polley) a survivor now confined to a wheelchair.
Stephens' case is also hindered by his own personal turmoil. His
daughter Zoe (Caerthan Banks) is a drug abuser who has been through
(and dropped out of) countless rehab centers and clinics. Through
frantic phone calls at inopportune times, Stephens learns that his
daughter is in serious trouble. In effect, Stephens anguish is similar
to that of the parents in his lawsuit. He is dealing with the loss of
a child.
Atom Egoyan is an impressive director. The Sweet Hereafter is similar
to his previous work - 'Exotica' in many ways. From his non-linear
form of storytelling to his beautiful, long shots of landscapes (The
rugged snowy mountain in this film and the big grassy prairie in
'Exotica' are great examples). Many people (my wife included) felt the
bouncing time line a bit distracting, but I felt that it was effective
and that it enhanced the story.
Dealing with grief and loss is the major issue with this film. Egoyan
skillfully introduces the characters and reveals how they are dealing
with the tragedy.  Very painful, touching and sometimes disturbing
memories unfold, as secrets of the inhabitants in the town are
revealed. Adding to the poignancy of the story is the wonderful
narration of a Robert Browning poem "The Pied Piper of Hamelin" (where
the film gets its title), drawing similarities between Nicole and a
character in the poem.
This is an impressive ensemble cast, even though there are no big name
actors in this film (except Holm). Most noteworthy Sarah Polley (the
Boston Society of Film critics gave her their award for Best
Supporting Actress), who not only portrays the courageous moral center
of the film very well, but also wrote and performed most of the songs
on the soundtrack. She deserves an Academy Award nomination.
The Sweet Hereafter leaves many loose ends and questions unanswered,
most notably the situation with Stephens daughter. It is unlikely that
a film like this could possibly have a happy ending, but a lesser film
could easily have forced some kind of resolution or closure to some
(or even all) of the characters. Egoyan trusts his audience. This is
one of the best films I have seen this year and eagerly await Atom
Egoyans next film.
Written by Randy Turgeon. January 15, 1998

Author
Bill Chambers
starring Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus
written by Atom Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks
directed by Atom Egoyan
No filmmaker deconstructs a story as well as Atom Egoyan. I'm
referring, specifically, to the narrative form. In The Sweet
Hereafter, Egoyan tells his story in a similar framework to his
Exotica or The Adjuster. Said story, of a fatal school bus accident in
the small town of Sam Dent, British Columbia, that shatters the morale
of the locals, is told in a most unstraightforward manner.
When the film opens, the accident has already happened, and Stephens
(the wonderful Holm), a polite ambulance-chaser, has arrived with the
promise of a lawsuit that will eek out the truth of what really
occurred that fateful morning.  Throughout, we get to meet the parents
of the dead, broken souls who follow Stephens like "The Pied Piper"
(passages of which are read during the film). But there is one living
passenger, the paralyzed Nicole (Polley), whose dark secrets of a life
before the accident may affect her decision to testify.
We finally do see the accident, about three quarters into the film,
which is a stunning visual effect. A horrific long take that shows the
bus sliding, then stopping, then collapsing into a frozen lake, is the
best digital trickery in any movie this year and, perhaps, ever, in a
motion picture.
The fractured narrative also intercuts a preoccupied Stephens on an
airplane, traveling to meet his HIV-positive runaway daughter, as well
as glimpses of the artificially happy lives these people led
pre-accident.
I have a problem not with the story or story structure, but with
Egoyan's heavy- handedness behind the camera. For the first hour or
so, I can quite honestly say I was on the verge of tears; these are
miserable, miserable people. But that's just the problem: so anguished
are these folk that sympathy wanes after a while, when a lot of
sadness becomes too much. Also, a subplot involving incest rings
untrue. Perhaps it wouldn't feel so contrived if it weren't shot in
such a tasteful manner. There are two characters who are father and
daughter; when they first appeared I thought they were lovers. I was
half-right.
Nevertheless it's worth-seeing. The delightful critic Geoff Pevere
recently wrote that "American films are about action, Canadian films
are about consequences," hence a recent wave of films about the
effects of shock and death from Toronto directors, including Crash and
Kissed. The Sweet Hereafter is much better than either of these two
films, simply because it's not boring or, in the case of Kissed,
afraid of its own material (necrophilia). Egoyan is a fine, fine,
postmodern storyteller, whose work is entertaining, edgy and smart, if
a bit too intellectual at times. Though I harped on the weightiness of
the material, I was always absorbed, engrossed, and surprised by The
Sweet Hereafter.

Author
jasanfor
THE SWEET HEREAFTER
(Fine Line Features)
 The key scene in "The Sweet Hereafter" includes one of the most disturbing
images you're likely to see this year: a schoolbus full of children plunges
over a bank, rolls out onto a frozen lake and pauses for a few seconds
before the ice underneath it gives way and the bus and its passengers
disappear into the frigid water below. It's a  moment that will change the
people of the tiny Canadian town of Sam Dent forever, as the once-insular
community begins to turn upon itself with neighbor betraying neighbor in a
race for justice, money and, the most elusive thing of all, peace of mind.
 Based on the acclaimed novel by Russell Banks, "The Sweet Hereafter" is
both deeply disturbing and almost relentlessly grim, which is hardly
unexpected, given the subject matter. The true surprise is director Atom
Egoyan's approach to the material. In the hands of Hollywood, this might
have been sensationalistic; at the very least it would have been ripe with
scenes of hysterical parents and angry townsfolk. But Egoyan finds in Banks'
book a fable, a story about the journey from shock to grief to renewal, "the
sweet hereafter" of the title. Late in the film, Robert Browning's "The Pied
Piper of Hamelin" is read as a bedtime story, and it becomes a perfect
metaphor for the strange chain of events that have pulled Sam Dent apart.
 The man largely responsible for the dissent is Mitchell Stephens (Ian
Holm), a lawyer from out of town who arrives in Sam Dent hoping to put
together a class-action lawsuit against the manufacturer of the bus. A
seasoned pro, Stephens knows exactly the right words to say to move these
small-towners to his side. "I'm here to give your anger a voice," he tells
the distraught parents of one of the victims. "There's no such thing as an
accident. The word doesn't mean anything to me." That's a lie, of course: To
Stephens the accident means a potential financial windfall if he can win the
case, which will ultimately turn largely on the testimony of Nicole (Sarah
Polley), a gifted young singer who survived the crash but has been left
crippled. Nicole's father Sam (Tom McCamus), with whom she's had an odd and
possibly incestuous relationship, is among the most money-hungry in the
community, although it's difficult to tell whether he wants compensation
because of Nicole's injuries or because of her new aloofness toward him.
 Stephens, too, has a difficult time with his own daughter, a drug-dazed
wanderer named Zoe (Caerthan Banks) who calls him frequently on his cellular
phone, demanding money and attention in between lies. It is this aspect of
Stephens that allows Egoyan to show us the man's secret heart and
well-shrouded grief. Obviously, Stephens' quest for remuneration for the
parents of Sam Dent is fueled at least partially by his realization that he
has in fact lost his own child, who's become one of the living dead.
 The acting is mostly low-key and understated, in keeping with the film's
tone. Holm and Polley are particularly moving, but Bruce Greenwood, as one
of the few citizens to resist Stephens' spell, is also memorable.  As in
Egoyan's previous film "Exotica," the director paints this picture
deliberately and somewhat abstractly, which may frustrate those who prefer
to have everything spelled out and clarified. In some spots, "The Sweet
Hereafter" is almost too oblique for its own good, particularly in a finale
that almost seems to smack of "The X Files." But Egoyan also conjures up
some powerful scenes, such as when Stephens interviews Dolores (Gabrielle
Rose), the bus driver who's become a town pariah since the accident, and
whose living room wall is adorned with framed photos of each of the kids on
the bus, staring out at her like a gallery of little ghosts.
James Sanford

Author
Luke Buckmaster
REVIEW: The Sweet Hereafter
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, Gabrielle
Rose, Arsinee Khanjian, Alberta Watson, Maury Chaykin
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producers: Atom Egoyan and Camelia Frieberg
Screenplay: Atom Egoyan based on the novel by Russell Banks
Australian theatrical release: July 16
In The Sweet Hereafter, Atom Egoyan has tackled one of the most daring
and hard to pull off methods of filmmaking, which most directors would
crumble at the sight of.  His messy, but beautifully interlaced
narration is utterly stunning to say the least.  Although not as sharply
written as Wag the Dog or The Ice Storm, this is in no way a bad thing:
Egoyan resists the temptation to tighten the screws and wrap the film up
in a neat package.  It is, with all the odds stacked against it, a
tragically extraordinary and utterly unforgettable piece.
Devastation strikes a small town in British Colombia when a school bus
crashes off the side of a road, killing twenty kids.  As can be
expected, the town is awash with grief, and produces a mixed array or
irate parents.  Each parent deals with their sorrow in a unique way; and
when visiting attorney Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) begins to search for
who to blame (and of course, who to sue) he becomes a welcomed intruder
for many and a painful visitor for some.  Mitchell perhaps cares so much
about this tragedy due to the loss of his own drug-addicted daughter,
facing fear each time his cellular phone rings ("This is my daughter
ringing, or it could be the police telling me that she's dead").
I haven't seen any other of Egoyan's films, but from what I've heard,
the setup of The Sweet Hereafter is a not a change in style for him.
Twisty, twirly, fast paced and pieced together like a puzzle that only
looks right at the very end.  It's actually quite ingenious; a skillful
way of handling tough material to cover, and a wonderfully visionary
form of directing.
Although I thought that I had also seen no films featuring Ian Holm,
looking at his profile, I've no doubt seen his face many times before
(starring in, amongst many others, Alien and Chariots of Fire).  He
gives an effulgent performance; adding multiple dimensions to his
character - Mitchell is a comprised man who structures himself so that
emotions can be conventionally pushed aside.  It is only when he meets
one of his daughter's old friends that we get a glimpse of the heart
inside this seemingly apathetic character. Without a doubt, he strikes
me as one of the most intriguing on screen personalities so far this
year (tying in top spot with Robert Duvalle's "The Apostle EF" in The
Apostle).
A bunch of memorable scenes help the film keep its stride, and maintain
an engaging level of interest.  Strangely enough, they appear at the
most unexpected times: a car wash is the stage for a striking
introduction to Mitchell and his daughter, and a rendition of "The Pied
Piper of Hamelin" becomes a necessary to the film's narration.
Charming and passionate but, at the same time, terrifying and tragic,
The Sweet Hereafter is one of those unique cinematic gems that you just
don't see all that often.  Stirring emotions is one thing, but
manipulating and confusing them at the most unexpected times is another.
A shattering but rewarding, complex but complete piece of irregular film
making.  If this is an example of how a less sharp and pointed edged
film is conceived, then bring 'em on.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au
